Sex education from the internet:  1. FUCK IT. 2. FUCK IT. 3. FUCKING THING SUCKS 4. RIGHT BEHIND YOU!
Interesting that you'd want to tell the up to 34% of the population who voted against him (during the years he's run) to fuck off as well.  Also, I doubt you've explored the pros and cons of his opponents over the years.  Your pronouncement is useless and lacking a basis in clear judgement.   
&gt;Yes, you mentioned current rainfall. Although as I pointed out it was a meaningless point to make.  It's called a joke.
I don't see the whole point of campaigns returning money to contributors that they don't like. The candidate is basically admitting that they *can* be bought, but they just want to be choosy about who is buying them.
Well, Florida screwed it self ....it IS America's wang.
A chilling look at just one of the many horrors that we will face if they ever outlaw abortion. AND ... a horror we *already* face because they would rather preach abstinence over sexual knowledge.
&gt;They may be parents, but that doesn't mean that they automatically become the best instructors about sex.  It's not a school's job to decide how good a parent will teach their kids about sex. 
&gt;They may be parents, but that doesn't mean that they automatically become the best instructors about sex.  It's not a school's job to decide how good a parent will teach their kids about sex. 
I learned more from this comment then my week long course in sex-ed. This will be useful, thanks.
Looking forward to your reviews.
[Interesting TED video on happiness, and why we don't need the things we think we do to achieve it.](http://www.ted.com/index.php/talks/view/id/97)
Olbermann's a bloody genius and also rather brave for what he's doing. He's also a bag of gold for MSNBC because he's very popular.
Serious spammers who do not target your site specifically are easily fought off, either with captcha if need be, or with trap fields.  Serious spammers who _do_ target your site specifically will automagically register at your site, captcha and whatnot be damned, and will use automagically created e-mail accounts for that.  Registration stops neither spammers, nor does it keep out trolls (Unless you go full-scale Something Awful "You must pay to register" style). It _does_ prevent people who just happened to come by and would have something to contribute from participating, since they sometimes can't be arsed to register somewhere just to post one little thing.
So fake, I can tell from the pixels.
You could probably come up with quite the dialog along the lines of [Penny Arcade's comic](http://www.penny-arcade.com/comic/2003/4/11/).  "So I first create a parent.  It becomes a [daemon](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Daemon_%28computer_software%29), then spawns a bunch of children.  One of these makes sure that we're in [promiscuous mode](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Promiscuous_mode).  It starts snooping, waiting until it sees something interesting -- maybe activity from [SATAN](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/SATAN), maybe some other sort of [penetration test](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Penetration_test).  We're especially interested if we discover that the attacker is trying to [finger](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Finger_protocol) us or probe us in other sketchy ways, possibly poking around for a [back door](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Backdoor_%28computing%29).  At this point, we can assume that the attacker is trying to [exploit](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Exploit_%28computer_security%29) any of our weaknesses. Our goal then becomes to lead the prober to a [honey](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Honeypots_in_espionage_fiction)[pot](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Honeypot_%28computing%29).  This system can expand greatly.  In our example setup, we have several local systems and another at home attached to my [naked DSL](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Naked_dsl) line.  During initial [negotiation](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Negotiation_%28BDSM%29), the children exchange connection information -- we want to keep our children responsive, and children with a [long, fat pipe](http://csdl2.computer.org/persagen/DLAbsToc.jsp?resourcePath=/dl/proceedings/&amp;toc=comp/proceedings/ispan/2004/2135/00/2135toc.xml&amp;DOI=10.1109/ISPAN.2004.1300495) interacting with many other children will hurt performance of the system as a whole. They will choose a master and place the rest in a [master-slave](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Master-slave_%28computers%29) relationship with it.  Normally, we keep the children in a [jail](http://www.unixwiz.net/techtips/chroot-practices.html), so that if the children themselves are attacked and successfully exploited, it's not a big concern -- it won't affect anything outside of the jail.  Our daemons provide synchronized termination.  When one dies, so do all the others.  Normally, we signal the children to [kill](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Kill_%28Unix%29) their parents.  If the parent is killed by someone else, no problem -- we just have its child notify the other daemons, then kill itself.  If the child is killed first, it will become a [zombie](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Zombie_process) unless the parent reaps it.  After the parent does so, it notifies the other daemons and kills itself.  ...What's with the expression?"
Not if you have a horse in the race.
Oh.My.Fucking.God.  This is the kind of shit that happens when you let the intelligence community run around without oversight or some kind of check/balance.  I kinda wanted to join the FBI, but with this kind of shit being pushed I'm hesitant.
She got pregnant from sitting on a strange toilet seat.
Hillary  is 20 mil in debt...she can't afford to give anything away.  Also, who cares who donates to the campaigns?  It's how they use it that matters.
It happens every day.  A known killer is set free because there was illegal search and seizure.  So, its not ok to do it without consent or warrant if I kill someone with a cleaver.  Its ok to do it if you think, think, that I was drinking and driving.  That makes no sense.
Yes. But you also have the right to *not* vote for that nominee in the general election.
i am so confused.
I really wonder how the different formats started. I'm sure it was forever ago, but would still be interesting to find out. Who was first? Who wouldn't change to the first guy's standard? What was their reason?   To a user mm/dd/yyyy, dd/mm/yyyy and yyyy-mm-dd are all the same, none is more complicated than another (the same amount of characters even). Seems odd that we wouldn't have decided on a real standard quite a long time ago. We all agree that it's hh:mm:ss right?
Life is too short to be married to a bitch. Exit...stage left. If you have kids, chances are they will be better off. Take a fresh start. It's better to live a poor life with less material things, with the opportunity of a good woman and better job prospects then to be married to a bitch and hate your life.
There is no such thing as a lazy programmer. They make incredibly complex tasks look very simple.
I didn't say a 50,000 line code base, and I didn't mean it.  I meant a 5 line code base.  As I said, he didn't know how to do CIN.  He told us to copy and paste our code into MICROSOFT WORD.  It's not just a matter of him being unfamiliar with cin because he was usually busy studying the topographic characteristics and high-order polynomials or studying the impact of relative cache sizes on processor performance or anything like that.  He knew VERY little about computers at all.  After we got him fired, the university started a program that I think would be great for all universities to implement.  When a candidate got to the end of the hiring process, they had the candidate come in and give a presentation to upperclassmen on any subject he/she wanted to cover and then handled a Q&amp;A session with the students and they wrote up their opinion of the person.  We ended up with a new professor who only had a masters degree but was very experienced both in the practical sense of making code work, and also in the theoretical sense.  His presentation was on graph theory and was explained very well.  He worked out very well.  If they'd done that with Dr. Kauser, they wouldn't ever have had to buy him out of that 5 year contract.  It'd only take 15 minutes for the students to determine that he could barely figure out a powerpoint presentation, let alone being able to TEACH CS.
...they're called super delegates. 
Not really that funny.
I neither distrust nor hate Israel qua Israel.  I distrust all governments.  I hate war.
"doctors usually don't suspect a brain-eating amoeba until it's too late." Be afraid, be very afraid.
Yeah, that cognitive dissonance stuff. You could call it loyalty. I suppose you can't have loyalty without it.  EDIT: At least without a little of it.
I'm fond of the last response:  "Let me introduce you to probability theory."
HA! 
PS: I think [this is a better photo of the inside](http://architypes.net/image/vancouver-library-square-interior) - it captures the feel of the the place really well. I don't think the photographer has used any "trick photography" - it's just really cool like that to be able to stand inside the stacks and look across to the reading rooms like that.
I have given up on trying to derive logic from these people. 
As tolerant as Christians are with Muslims, you think?
lube?
Actually, I WAS joking. Thanks for the info, I wasn't quite sure what mulching was. @ cyks, what's wrong with my name?
Perhaps it's because they are only there to make sure that this gets built:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Trans-Afghanistan_Pipeline
You bold words **\*\*like this\*\***.
This is beyond ridiculous, but I take solace in the fact that Clinton still has no chance.
So here is where things stand now:  The magic number is now 2,118.  Obama gained 68 delegates. Clinton gained 94.5.  Obama now needs 66 delegates to clinch.  There are 86 pledged delegates still to be determined from Puerto Rico, Montana, and South Dakota.  Assuming a wash, Obama's number will be down to  23 by Tuesday.  Had the DNC not allowed any MI or FL delegates, it's possible he would've been able to clinch on Tuesday.
i love heroes 2 as well :)
Huh, and here I was hoping he had a backbone.
Actually does not seem conceptually hard. Last I heard it was only like 20,000 to get a pound in to orbit. You would probably need to maybe quadrupole that to get to the moon. And you are not going to get the bulk rate. But still.
Yes, Detroit, A decaying, murderous, abandoned city:  http://www.skyscrapercity.com/showthread.php?p=19377047
Inconceivable!
What the fuck!? Obama wasn't even on the ballot! I'm a little ticked about Florida, but it's understandable. But how could you even call Michigan a contest? She was running against herself and she *still* only got half the vote. COME ON.
While one should also post it to feedback, this really does qualify as the kind of news I want to see on reddit. News about my news source itself. :)
What kind of car had he been driving? 
&gt;&gt;&gt;In fact a monopoly is defined as a government backed exclusive market. &gt;&gt;&gt;The concept is little different to the modern BBC in fact.  &gt;&gt;The BBC is not a monopoly, even though they are government backed.  There are...other channels on terrestrial.  &gt;Try to develop some reading comprehension skills.
Interesting that you say that.  I have not seen it reported anywhere that Hillary campaigned in Florida, but she did.  I live in Florida.  I saw it.  She made a point to claim that she was not "campaigning", she was just "fund raising".  But, she came down here and was all over the TV and newspapers the day before the primary.  It looked like campaigning to me.  Obama played by the rules and did not even come to the state.   [Edit] I should have said the weekend before the primary.
They'll never last!
You can't nominate someone who won't run.
And as a web programmer, I've personally decided that everyone must use ISO 8601 to represent dates and times.  Now that I'm an adult and have influence on the way that people think, I'm going to make sure that people start and continue to think in correct, complete, and concise ways.   The whole America vs European way of representing dates, measurements, and other whatnots will fall away as irrelevant once programmers realize that humans can think of things in simple terms too. Every time you strftime a datetime into something other than ISO 8601, god kills 1/2 a kitty.
They could do that but I doubt they would. The party is going to want someone who has the appeal of the base.
Nice video!
Link?
Nah.  Martian bacteria, phages, virii, whatever would not have grown up exposed to life on earth.  Therefore, they would not be evolved to cope with it effectively.  Odds are, if a few microbes escaped, they would immediately die of oxygen poisoning in an alien biosphere. Same goes for larger animals like simple worms or proto-fish (which are extremely improbably on mars, but might live under the seas of Europa, for instance.  They'd not do well on Earth, any more than we're going to go for a walk on Mars or under the Europan ice without a space suit.  
Corporate power is profit-accountable. Bureaucracy, when not done right, is not accountable.  Compare that to us holding the government "accountable" every 4 years. And look -- it'll be only through luck that the person the American people admire (or rather, the person who American people can accept out of the options offered) can cut through bureaucracy.  We need range voting and greatly expanded powers over the government to get real accountability. I'm talking recalls, public oversight, ect.
I doubt it will be effective.  Interfaith dialog is likely to be moreso.
You're missing the point. Men are biologically driven to mate with youthful, pretty girls. Women are biologically driven to mate with powerful men.  No doubt exceptions exist, but if you don't realise the biological imperative behind human thinking then you are guilty of trying to place human thoughts and rationalisations over what is essentially unthinking desire. Its not really a choice.  Thats not to say personality doesn't play a part- i would rather be with a cool average-looking girl than a dull hot girl - but  i always take issue when women whine about men being shallow while eating another tub of Haagen-Daas. It does them no service to believe the lies of feminism.
I don't think any of them read what the article says.  Ted points out some interesting things.  The official atmospheric pressure of Mars is [1kPa](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mars) and earths is [100kPa](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Earth).   So how can there be "dustdevils" on Mars?  Why is it that the polar lander uses a [parachute](http://www.sciam.com/gallery_directory.cfm?photo_id=2B3A21F2-EDAC-40D3-4BB4500AF715240B&amp;sc=rss) when there is practcally no atmosphere to speak of?
I remember thinking at the day of his visit and remarkable statement and the even more remarkable/stupid statement by a Repub hack along for the walk that McCain had lost it. Old news, to be sure, but an important peek into McCain's brain. Headline, per usual, is slanted. 
you'll all pay.
McCain will be a bigger problem for himself than any libertarian could ever be.
Why do I smell a FOX reality show in the making. Trash detectives. I'd go for that. Come check it out. I put my incriminating stuff in the little old ladies receptical across the street. I also throw out half eatten protein bars. Those things taste like - protein bars.
A lot of people are right.
You hit the nail on the head. Why Hillary doesn't just switch sides is beyond me.
Thanks, Battleloser. That's all I'm asking for, and I'm happy to find someone else interested in dialogue rather than bandwagon screed.
Jury nullification...I love it!
Your link provides this FOIA response:  &gt;In Summary:  &gt; - She determined that the FBI had 85 videotaptes that might be relevant. Of those, 56 "of these videotapes did not show either the Pentagon building, the Pentagon crash site, or the impact of Flight 77 into the Pentagon on September 11."  &gt; - Of the 29 remaining videotapes, 16 "did not show the Pentagon crash site and did not show the impact of Flight 77 into the Pentagon."  &gt; - Of the 13 remaining tapes which showed the Pentagon crash site, 12 "only showed after the impact of Flight 77."  &gt; - The videotape taken from the Citgo gas station did not show the impact.  &gt; - No videotapes were located from the Sheraton Hotel, though she located a videotape from the Doubletree Hotel.   According to this, the agent is saying that only 1 video exist of the actual crash in all the videos they have (85). I'm sure the other videos would be illuminating, but there are many after crash stills and video on the net already.
What good are rules without consequences?
Richard D. James, Aphex Twin, takes his show on the road.
Heh, well, I just finished watching All The President's Men. ;)
One of the questions posed to us at the end of a college class on moral reasoning:  &gt;*A student is entering the last two years of college and is beginning to think about a possible career. The student has focused on two areas: a biology (pre-med) program and classics (Latin and Greek language and cultural studies). The student has done very well in both areas. The student can imagine being a doctor working in public health, and seems to have all the makings of an excellent doctor. But Classics is the students real love - there is something about the ancient Mediterranean world which the student finds fascinating. What career choice should the student make?*  Does anyone think that this really presents a moral dilemma? Questions like this have been put to us for the whole quarter, and I have to say that I'm a bit disappointed. The above described scenario does not have one morally relevant aspect - it's amoral.  And yet I contrived several pages worth of explanation, going over egoism, conjuring up implicit social contracts, talking about virtue, and trying desperately to *somehow* contort Kant and Rawls' theories into having an opinion on the matter.  But it was all filler - drivel. In truth, this is not a moral question.  Am I just bad at moral philosophy, is this the kind of situation that moral philosophers really feel it is important to analyze?  *edit:*  *I'm not asking what the correct choice is. I'm just saying that [these](http://reddit.com/info/6lkgb/comments/c046zof) kinds of questions are amoral.*  *Yes, there may be some issues of **ethics** involved - but not morality, specifically. In other words, if the student goes into Classics, or into medicine, in neither case has he done something morally **wrong**. Framing it in terms of a moral choice implies that one of the options would be immoral.*  *If I [fail to go see my friend in the hospital](http://reddit.com/info/6lkgb/comments/c046zof), I haven't done something **morally wrong**. I've been a bad friend, I've probably decreased the chance that she might come see me if I get hurt - but it wouldn't make me a bad person, it wouldn't be immoral.*
Allowed? Hmmm. How about 911?
count all whites &lt;/joke&gt;
so Clinton gains 5 whole votes from Michigan. Big deal.
I agree more legislation is not a measure of success. I do think Bush is an aberration, in the qualitative use of modern executive power. Roosevelt, Washington, Jefferson, etc. all used executive power in excess of Constitutional limits. As to Clinton inventing the violating of human rights of citizens and non-citizens, I doubt it. I have no idea if his administration coined the term rendition. Do you have a link on that? You are clearly a thoughtful person. Is it your presumption that, like many Libertarians we can do without the Fed, the IRS, Dept of Education, SSA, etc.? I'm enjoying this conversation.
I am **NOT** going to click that link.
Did you honestly just claim that we send astronauts into space and they do... nothing?
That is indeed annoying, but Myspace... Myspace is so broken. That annoyance would be near the end of the list. At least with that, all you need to do is press back a couple times.
Funnniest live blog of the meeting  http://www.dailykos.com/story/2008/5/31/132944/089
Actually they were for a long time, but the Supreme Court ruled in *Gitlow v. New York* in 1925 that the 14th Amendment had extended the free speech clause of the 1st Amendment to state and local governments. If a book publisher, on the other hand, decides to ban the word "The" in their books, it's perfectly within its rights to do so.
I'd upmod this a million times if I could!
Correct, Belgium. French and Dutch because those are the languages of our country, english is also mandatory and depending on what you study german is sometimes mandatory. Off the record, I studied ICT in a technical school.
But think, now that it costs so much, people will finally invest in the more efficient alternatives!
Soon I hope!  Tupperware and Jesus? Holy crap.  Let's go and get us some.
I agree with most everything you say here. And even better, I prefer to practice solutions that adhere to your train of thought.  However, most clients are dumb. And rather than take your professional, experienced word - they like to make you cave on some of those aspects.  Let me address each of your points just to hopefully keep things simple.  * I agree. Typically, I like to let the user choose their own password. My code will determine if it contains invalid characters, etc. However, many users will choose an easily guessed password and then will be pissed when their "secure" information is some how obtained. Generating the users password rarely solves any problems though as most applications allow the user to change their password. So overall, I agree with you. * This doesn't really seem to be an issue if you're sending this URL automatically via email or if it is dynamically generated on the page. Clicking a link is the same no matter if it's long or short. Now if you have to type it in, that's another story. But why not just copy and paste? I've never seen a URL so long that 2 copy-n-paste methods wouldn't resolve. * I agree. That's just stupid. Who actually does this? They need to learn about usability. * I agree here as well. I've personally miss-guessed captcha's because they are so un-readable. Poor solution. * I agree. I don't want spam. Who does? Unfortunately there are way to many clients that claim "that's how I make my living!" My typical response to that is, you should get a new job. You're going to get blacklisted and when you do - your days of spamming are over. This is one of the most ridiculous requests I hear - to automatically subscribe people. What's even worse is most clients don't want to use a subscription list that adheres to the law. They'd rather blast out a few thousand emails without a the required "unsubscribe" information. * I agree there too. This is the first thing you should think of and implement when dealing with forms. That's just incredibly stupid and no where near user friendly. It's easy to do, so why not? * Most likely, it's not the programmers scheme, it's the payment gateway's scheme. We can't help what formats these gateways accept. Although they are getting better. Most international credit data should and can be accepted. Another thing to remember here is that the user tends to enter wrong information, not update their information, or is using a card (credit or debit) that has insufficient funds or access. From my experience most of these denials can be attributed to the card issuer or card holder.   I'm in no way trying to discredit your concerns. I agree with most of them. I just want to show that it's not always up to the developer, which is in most cases - bullshit.
doin'wong
YYYY-MM-DD HH:MM:SS is ordered from longest to shortest duration, and it's also how humans think about time. When you ask someone when something happened in the past, they don't start out by telling you what day or hour or second or minute it happened. Year is the trump card for dates and times, and you go divide up time down from there.
Not at all. Flowers don't care what chemicals are in them by and large. Many, like the flowers of certain cherry trees are used to clean up some of the worst toxins, like the mercury and byproducts found in soils around old foundries.  Since I do use the compost for vegtables though, I don't put paper with inks in my compost, but coffee filters, tea bags, tp from the wastebasket in the bathroom from blowing my nose, that all goes in.  The bathroom wastebasket is a real underused composting resource actually, especially if your wife has long hair and the wastebasket is almost always full of hair pulled out of a hairbrush. :)
A more detailed account can be found [here](http://www.motherjones.com/news/feature/2008/03/murat-kurnaz.html).
I'm pretty sure HMOs have actuary tables.  I've read that Britain's NHS actually does.   Also I can't help but note that the hospital with that woman in the iron long apparently couldn't be too bothered about backup generators.
I've been having a blast with Reddit myself.  It isn't quite a phase of life, yet, but given a few more minutes a day...
Ah quite yer whining. Would you like some cheese with that whine? www.FireMe.To/udi
werd.
I bet it will work better going from West to East rather than the other way.
"Do you want to get left behind when they all go to Technology Heaven?"  "How many did you want to buy?  All of them?!"
Any project with an extracurricular TV deal in place would get automatically disqualified.
They both campaigned there.  They were both on the ballot at least in Florida.  And the DNC rules are very clear that you cannot strip a state of more than 50% of it's delegates.  So...  This is exactly what should happen.
In the same light ....  His crimes are the things that now seem normal to him  ;-)
Good for you Missouri.
lol, It's a Joe Piscipoe quote. I am hot, however, I live in Houston.
 "The typical visitor reads rawstory.com."  Thats hilarious.
I feel like we have something in common..
it's funny because she looks like she was the winner of the masterbate-a-thon
&gt;If someone has done it, it's deliberate  Usuaully mandated by a project designer who has no real clue of internet etiquette or what have you...  Too many idiots out there telling programmers what to do, and this is a good example of this case.  The rest, I agree with you are programmer's sloth...   
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Leopold_II_of_Belgium   the whites in Africa deserved what they got. they were, and still are deserving of the African's hatred. they stepped their boots all over the faces of the native population for centuries, who the fuck would expect the Africans not to fight back?
They didn't build a car, but they did build a town. Modern city planning actually took hold with the company town around the turn of the last century. And its companies like Hershey and Levers (the soap company) that created the idea of planned communities and made them work (literally). The company owned the homes which it provided to workers, and the stores that sold workers goods and food. Of course this kept the money in the company and left little way of escape for the average employee, but as a system it build some of the communities that are the considered the 'model' for modern development these days.   As strange as it sounds, there is no reason Google could not just buy up Detroit, restore/rebuild it and create a corporate city and have it not work. Of course it would be pretty damn 'evil' sounding, but that all comes down to how you feel about are search engine running friends.
but then we would have to send another one to fix the first.... where would it end?  /madness
Herb Zipper is better  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wBnbAzp7w10
I find the equation of money to the worth of a human life quite morally troubling.
I live in Toronto Canada and because of the great lakes the two closest entry points into the U.S. are Detroit and Buffalo, so our first impressions aren't so good.  One thing that always shocked me were the old run down buildings everywhere and the abandoned neighborhoods.  Up here developers would fight each other over them so they could renovate them into lofts, offices, etc...but down there they are left to rot.
well I'm convinced.
Huh? Please explain.
Jesus also had heat ray vision and could make time go backwards.
You mean `title` attribute, because `alt` is supposed to be _alternative_ which is used _only_ when image cannot be displayed (never in addition to image). [The "tooltip" effect and the title attribute – J. Korpela](http://www.cs.tut.fi/~jkorpela/html/alt.html#tooltip)
This was suggested on PBS (The Newhour, one of the last true news show) a couple nights ago....I'll try to find the link.  And to be honest I not sure if I should be relived that the DNC listens to real news or that they're essentially bending over to keep her going..
&gt;Woah hold on there, dd/mm/yyyy is not U.K. style. It's sane style, everyone style,  Actually, the same style is yyyy/mm/dd - biggest to smallest so you can sort on.  Neverminding ISO 8601 for a second, it makes sense because you can sort on it.  
It's probably what should've happened in the end, since the DNC rules clearly state you can't punish a state by striping more than 50% of it's delegates.  But in the end it's irrelevant, McCain is going to win in a landslide.
If Hillary gets the nomination, it will be the 3rd consecutive election that has been stolen.   Yep, she sure is about a change from the GWB ways...
LOL...youse rightwingers got yer ASSES handed to you by me on this thread. Ya know why? Cuz some young person out there READ what I have to say. And that is a win. ya know why? Cuz the information aint really that available to the public.  Buh bye rightwingers...
No proof but I firmly believe America's elite class will become increasingly wealthier with more "power" while the working-poor, mega-millions of them, will slide into a 2nd-world life-style (to accompany the millions of illegal aliens they have to compete with) while the proverbial middle-class will shrink but not disappear even though the defining income levels of what is middle class will be reduced.  Rest assured that the elite's bureaucrats and bureaucracies will likely increase in order to ensure the elites are kept at a distance from the commoners and to ensure the status quo is maintained.  Also expect law enforcement bureaucracies to grow to keep the downtrodden hordes in their rightful position in society; serving the elite class, the bureaucratic class and corporate America.  Thus I believe is our fate and I expect the majority of commoners to continue bleating their contentment via the acculturation/indoctrination/brainwashing that trains the masses of simpletions to kow tow to their betters/masters/leaders/heroes/whatever.
Fortunately, [tor](http://www.torproject.org/).
I wonder what would happen if you stabbed him in the bollocks with a broom-handle?
WRT to the last one, whenever I worked on websites, I did these things:  Credit Cards: Let them enter whatever they wanted; Stripped all non-numerals, then ran the CRC check to determine (basic) validity and card type.  Bonus: No "enter card type" pulldown, though the pulldown can be used as a very effective "we don't accept card type X" reminder, as they have to select it from the list.  Phone Numbers: Enter whatever you like.  Same as CCs; strip down to digits, then run it through our phone number algorithm.  Granted, we're a phone company, so this was low-hanging fruit.  Dates: We used a perl module called "Date::Manip".  You can enter dates like "last thursday" or "friday, oct 5, 8 pm".  Naturally, it also accepts YY/MM/DD or the (retarded) YY/DD/MM.
I recognize all of your points as plausible, at least without any context. Then one brings the *unimaginably* large number of people involved into the picture and they become implausible. That *that many* people could stay quiet about a *direct attack* on the U.S. - not a "possibility that countless US civilians would be killed" - is *not* plausible to me. If you can convince me of that, you'll find it a lot easier to convince me on about everything else.  I guess, to boil it down, I can say this: You have what appears to me to be a conspiracy theory. If you can convince me that the "conspiracy" part is plausible, I will *then* examine the theory.
Why didn't they just go for the backdoor...  There's always a back-door.
you can't really blame them.  They aren't doing a service for you out of the goodness of their hearts, they are hoping to generate some revenue.  Who wouldn't?  
only on reddit can someone get modded up for advocating pedophilia
how exactly does one jump into own subconscious?
How is it emo?
&gt;The abuse, which occurred at Foulk's home, was not an isolated incident, Jefferson County prosecutor Pat Knauth said.   &gt;"After this student made an outcry, others came forward," Knauth said in a phone conversation Wednesday, explaining **Foulk's activity with other girls did not rise to criminal levels.**  &gt;**The substitute teacher had a history of befriending girls in classes she taught, the prosecutor said, allowing girls to stay nights at her house.**  &gt;**"She would provide alcohol to them, talk about sex with them, try to get them drunk," Knauth said. "It was obvious, at least to me, that she was grooming these other girls but that the other girls stepped out of the situation before something could happen." **   Can anyone defend this behavior as noncriminal for any reason other than the attacker's vagina?
What, not 3/5ths?
I think that's an important point too, you really only heard the Clinton camp stamping their foot and whining to have those states' votes in - the Obama group, who really stood to be hurt in Michigan wasn't heard to be making quite the fuss that Clinton was.  I think the overall takeaway is good for Obama and a blemish on the Clinton campaign - even in the eyes of Clinton supporters.  They need to be reminded, between now and the election, that this was HILLARY'S DOING, so if they feel underrepresented, it's the result of HER agreement.  Frustrated with Hillary now?  Imagine what it'll be like if you actually VOTE for her.
CELLPHONES that the HOSTAGES USED IN 2001 WERE NOT CAPABLE OF MAKING PHONE CALLS FROM THE ALTITUDE THEY WERE TRAVELING, The Accountants from the Pentagon that were assassinated by a custom made U.A.V. WERE GOING TO COME FORWARD TO THE AMERICAN PUBLIC ON THE BLACK BUDGET among other things. 
Apparently it's true; it was something called eShop.
I love it when these 'perfect' ideas surface.  They NEVER get built.
Bermuda shorts.  Skinny jeans.  Now this.  Gods damn it, fashion world.  Just stop.  Please.
Rather, is the fact that you're an idiot leading to all of the above?
He wouldn't have had so much influence, if any influence at all, if the actual truth were known about him i.e. that he is a fictional character as opposed to a real person. It is therefore important that the truth be researched and disseminated.
&gt;I really wonder how the different formats started.  mm/dd/yyyy started because it's been common in English to write May 31, 2008 and fits this format.  dd/mm/yyyy otoh probably came from a smallest-largest mentality - French usually write dates as 31-May-2008 or whatever.  They usually say the number before the month.  yyyy-mm-dd came from smart database folks who like dates to be sortable.  Truth be told this is the most readable also because there's no ambiguity like the other formats. Mostly though I'm a fan of mm/yyyy/dd just do be a dick and confuse people.  
&gt;He sent Obama $500 a check for %500  A simple typo? Or is one liberal blog breaking our nation's *mathematical laws*? And how is Presidential hopeful Barack Obama mixed up in this scandal?  The answers may surprise you. Details at 11.
69 - 59 = 5?  Edit: Oh yeah, they only count half, I'm a little slow tonight.
Sounds like something that would crumble once you actually become a big enough target to need it in the first place.
Ah, sorry, no I got that, I just wanted to give an outline of how I though I thought the law should view it.  I agree with your agreement about me agreeing with your original topic.  Obviously it couldn't go straight to law because of mp3's and all that jazz (and...wait for it...there we are, a letter because I plagiarized a trademarked phrase) but, yeah, you get what I'm getting at.
Can anything be truly infinite?
can iii play? 
Yeah, everybody sema_down() now.
Can someone mirror this? Link is fucked.
[That Venga Boys song is always blasting as a subtle form of torture.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aUUGblNjK20)
Intelligent.
Alea iacta est.
Nope, but you're not to far off :)
Maybe his security costs recently skyrocketed.
Keepin' the black man down: menthol cigarettes, malt liquor and...  religion!
&gt;The abuse, which occurred at Foulk's home, was not an isolated incident, Jefferson County prosecutor Pat Knauth said.   &gt;"After this student made an outcry, others came forward," Knauth said in a phone conversation Wednesday, explaining **Foulk's activity with other girls did not rise to criminal levels.**  &gt;**The substitute teacher had a history of befriending girls in classes she taught, the prosecutor said, allowing girls to stay nights at her house.**  &gt;**"She would provide alcohol to them, talk about sex with them, try to get them drunk," Knauth said. "It was obvious, at least to me, that she was grooming these other girls but that the other girls stepped out of the situation before something could happen." **   Can anyone defend this behavior as noncriminal for any reason other than the attacker's vagina?
Unlikely.  Obama will win the General Election by at least 50 electoral votes.  Maybe up to 150.  [The McCain Blowout Fallacy](http://www.realclearpolitics.com/articles/2008/05/the_mccain_blowout_fallacy.html)
what if the aliens get it and theyre like:  "Wtf does 10101010100001010110101101010101.......01010101 mean?"  Maybe next time well get the smart idea to give them a dvd player with solar powered cells so they can watch it.
I concur, if anyone loses for no fault of their own, it is the voters.
That's not why people object, and I believe high rises can be made relatively safe seismically.  The reason is aesthetics.
No, best to go all the way and just use seconds since epoch at UTC.
I don't need to look up the word "patronizing."  I know what the word means, and I know when I'm being patronizing.  When I'm being patronizing, it's because I mean to be patronizing.
Only if you were Earthworm Jim would this be NSFW.
try more than an American dollar, yes we are rich! :P( 1USD= .9937 Canadian)  http://www.xe.com/ucc/convert.cgi  a little bit of a depressing news story, I'm looking to graduate next year  and yes I am nervous about how much money I will be earning and what kind of life I'll be living when I first start working.  the comparisons they made were pretty bad though, I would think its pretty obvious that its going to be hard to find  good paying  jobs with degrees in 'film, communications, and popular culture' and 'broadcast journalism". One degree doesn't have a direct career path, and for the other  there are like 100 television spots for thousands of people who have the degree, its not going to be very lucrative.
someone call the zombies!
&gt; And if they are physically and mentally unable to make that decision  Was that the case here?
How many of those screaming Hillary supporters from Florida screamed at the Florida legislature not to set the Democratic primary date in violation of national party rules? None.  Ditto for Michigan supporters protesting against the state Democratic committee setting the primary date to early.  This is all total bullshit, and convinces me that even Hillary knows she is beaten. But she is not going to stop because her mission is Not to win the nomination but create a rift so deep that Obama can't win the general election.  Fuck the bitch.
It's a Christian sect. Where else did they get their ideas about the deity of Jesus, and the afterlife, and everything else? Did they come up with them independently? I don't think so.
Obama did not campaign in Florida.
It was her first time.
I want my free lunch now!
all that hype and all we get is some obscure face in a window.  
fuck. this.
holy shit. he really does look like richard d. james.  http://www.javno.com/slike/slike_3/r1/g2007/m07/x93144365105795386.jpg
Who the hell are you defining as "colonists" here?  The people in Tel-Aviv and Haifa?  One of the major parts of my positions was *leaving the settlers where they are without IDF protection*.  If they want to live in Palestine, they must live as Palestinians.  They only get IDF help, and then only to forcibly move them into really Israeli territory, if the State of Palestine attempts genocide.  Otherwise the Arabs can make them be fourth-class citizens or slaves for all I care; since the settlers are the ones so desperate to live in Judea and Samaria.
The term is "willful ignorance".  And, yes, like football, it's a national pastime.
Fenwick?
g2petter or rightcoast?
Fucking stupid != light-hearted fun?  Eating poo ice cream == light-hearted fun?  You gooks is some crazy mother-fuckers.
It's the PC era.  Cast off all logical rational thinking.  Always follow the warm fuzzy path and do what FEEEEEELS good.
They had to sneak the tapes in, they were very small.
essentially yes. it allows your browser to access dlls etc. if there is one best way to describe it, browser plus is a way out of the sandbox of the browser directly to the local system (on windows and mac). the demos i have seen do indeed do some cool stuff, but arguably at the expense of breaking the web in a way that was tried and rejected years ago.  and what will browser plus provide that flash doesn't? one could argue that adobe has already won the "one plugin to rule them all" issue.   i still hold out hope for the open web built on open standards. 
All this talk about "fairness" to the voters.  How are you fair to voters when you don't even include your canidate's name on the ballot!  What angers me the most is that Clinton supporters still wont be happy with the results.  I was all for NOT counting the votes because that's what Hillary and Obama agreed on way back when.  However, I understand about compromise and that's what they did, they changed the rules for you now shut up, we could just go back to no votes at all.  Besides, at the end of all this when Obama STILL has the majority of votes, will they HONOR the votes of the people and stop complaining?!?!
Ahh, the dogs of war: here fido!
Finding torrents is one thing, but unless this new system is implemented with rating systems and discussion on the torrents, it seems some sort of torrent site will still exist.
Yeah looks like Hillary was smarter than Obama in this respect. Right? And be objective in your verdict, no matter how much you might hate her
Pretty much as expected and I guess it's the best they could do in a bad situation. Frankly, this thing derailed a long time ago and it's a bit sad the DNC didn't get a grip on the situation much earlier. They've basicly given Hillary a free pass to stir up as much controversy as possible and what's even worse: her supporters seem to be buying it as well. While the voters of FL and MI shouldn't be disenfranchised Hillary has used this solely for her own political gain without any worries about the collateral damage she might cause. It's utterly despicable and saddening. Even more so because it allows her supporters another reason to defect in november. I can't imagine any solution being better but neither can I imagine anyone being truly happy about this. Obama supporters are rightly angered by the fact that their candidate didn't get a real chance to run in FL and Mi, and because of the way Hillary has used his respect for the rules against him and Hillary supporters are gonna be angered because they've just seen their last ray of hope die off... Meh...   
Ultimately, not eating would work.
I don't know. I don't love pop culture stories.
He still will.
What about Memphis TN, where this restaurant is located?
wtf about MICHIGAN!!! every one took their name off but her wtf!! this is changing the rules after the game has been played
Wait, what? Are you arguing against me, or for me? :P Regardless, you're being objective which rocks... most have trouble with that.
Naturally, what you call progress looks an awful lot like exploitation to me.
*No*, [this](http://images.starpulse.com/Photos/Previews/Ludacris-ps01.jpg) is ludicrous
Informative poster at the top of the article. Good to know "=" means equals.
A modern cpu could easily crack millions of your captchas a second.  On one of my sites I had it change the form element names to random values every time the sign up form reloaded, with a few other backend anti-spam measures I have never had a problem with spam and it isn't an annoyance to the user.
This one is way more disgusting...  http://www.youtube.com/v/Od-8H6DPb8g
Jesus sucked dinosaur cock!
Man, Floridians are so bad/dumb at democracy. 
FF2 - and I don't see it either. 
Yeah my sex ed class was like that too. Except we watched a penis ejaculating into a vagina rather than an anus. We also had to watch a woman giving birth.
Nowadays, teenagers can just eat ecstasy every day for those two weeks, and accomplish the same thing, with twice the fun. :)
I'd actually rather not say where I went to school... kinda defeats the purpose of having an anonymous internet pseudonym, doesn't it?  But no, not Fenwick either :P
From wikipedia: Designed by the same architect, the downtown Central Branch of the Vancouver Public Library has a very similar design. This is clearly apparent in the main foyer and the sweeping outer facade.
As with so many other aspects of life, males have a much higher suicide success rate than females.  As with so many other things they do, few females commit a successful suicide. The vast majority are "cries for help" and are not actual suicide attempts. Just like the female's efforts on the job, etc. Mere showmanship with little actually being sucessfully accomplished.
The black plague was also historically significant. That doesn't mean that we should like it or respect it. I see a good analogy here.
They're all white middle aged females.
Excitement, followed by wave of wave of guilt and disgust.
i say lets get rid of the primary/caucus nonsense and just have one vote, one time to decide the winner. Why do we need delegates and committees and superdelegates...its all just a show. I say we eliminate everything but the General election, let anyone who wants to run, run. Then lets see who wins that...government of the people, by the people, for the people...right??
seems backwards to me. i just washed a take-away cup so i could recycle it. didn't the water i wasted basically throw away any ecological value to what i did?
No, that is not how HTTP generally is programmed for at all. Remember, HTTP is generally stateless so no one would begin to think that this is the proper solution.  One easy way is to save the current URL in a hidden input on the page. That's what all web1.0 sites always did, myspace for example. This input is sent to the server when you redirect to the login page.
Another good method I use sometimes is to have another box labeled as "Fax 2" or something and set the css to hidden.   The bot will fill out the field because it's in the code. Then it falls into your clever trap.
You go to fox for your real news?
hmm, pretty much same as today, except in living colour
Great! Now let's focus on the 2012 Democratic Primaries. How about next Wednesday?
The Borg has determined that this is irrelevant.
I thought this chic said it best, you ignorant losers.  "I get your ire, re: Fundamentalist Christians. The Religious Right is Wrong and all that. You sound both really pissed-off and obsessed. You are wasting your energy - you could blow off steam by practicing YOUR philosophy or belief system, instead of borrowing one you HATE and reacting against it. All religions, once they are established, serve primarily as a societal tool, rather than an expression of devotion to anything or anyone in particular. As long as there are Humans, there will be Religion, which both brings people together and pits them against eachother. We humans are totally ridiculous. Really. Really.  So, your reaction to the “Religious Right” masks what you actually DO believe. Discover it, then get out there and practice! Unless you really believe in your disgust, and being better than others, which I really doubt. You sound like a disenfranchised Idealist - I encourage you to put your powers into that ideal. Don’t let the Christians run your life to the extent that yer blogging on them. There’s more to life, and you are it!"   
Journalism was dead way before reality shows and 'pop culture' stories took over the meadia
True, I take back my statement about the "universal good". What I should have said is, there's a great deal of difference between developing a technology which may be used for harm against one's countrymen, and supporting a direct terrorist attack against civilians. Although in some way, that's exactly what the nukes were.
And don't forget about the DVD on it. Now the aliens will have all of the information about Earth that they need to stage an attack.
Excellent decision. Otherwise the media will continue to harass him and Trinity over the opinions of anyone somewhat associated with the church.  What should instead be at issue is why the MSM won't ask Rove simple questions about his actions.
 “Forcing people to "be free" is exploitation. I believe in the self-determination of peoples.   Well the people of Iraq wanted to get rid of Saddam. They even had an uprising like in 1991 that was crushed.    “If tomorrow the Iraqis were to elect a hard-line Islamic fundamentalist regime in Iraq, the US would not allow it.”” They’re allowed Sharia Law in Afghanistan.. I don’t see why not. That simply wouldn’t be possible since they have 2 different religions that don’t want the same things.   “Their agenda, their goals, are to promote American empire to ensure American imperial dominance for the next century.”  “They wanted to exploit the US' military supremacy to translate the death of the USSR into a permanent state of US hyperpowerdom.” Their agenda is to use America’s force to spread freedom and democracy, by force if necessary. While I personally don’t believe you can spread freedom by force, I think the goal o spreading freedom and democracy is a good one. However if you look at history, we’ve been generally bringing those values not by force, but by cultural dominance.   “And what's even worse than that is that they didn't say they wanted to impose democracy through war and death. They said Iraq was a direct and real threat to the safety of the citizens of the United States.” In all fairness, the problems in Iraq have caused Iraq to be a huge base for Al Qaida types. So, while maybe under Saddam it wasn’t a threat to us, it is now. I didn’t hear before the war that “Iraq was a direct and real threat to the safety of the citizens of the United States”. I think that is the thinking now, and it makes logical sense. We fucked up their country, and if we don’t stay and fix it, they’re gonna come and fuck up our country.   “The whole premise of the Vietnam War and Korean War was to expel the Communist invaders. The world was free to choose its own destiny and America was there to protect everyone from this Communist takeover.” That’s not at all what was happening. There was the first world, us, the second world, the communists, and the third world over which we fought. We didn’t fight for the third world to make up their own mind. When we defended Korea from the Communist invasion we didn’t then say “Okay, well now you guy decided if you want to be like us or like them.” We installed dictators there, built up a capitalist system, and like always, capitalism leads to democracy (though I’m sure we encouraged them too).   “Would you have supported launching a war?” No, probably not. I think we should have helped when they gassed the Kurds, or better yet, I think we should have finished it off in the Gulf War. They had an uprising and wanted freedom. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1991_uprisings_in_Iraq  It was kinda silly to do it out of the blue. But really, I don’t think we should be liberating anyone.  I think we should just stick to our own business and show others how to live by example, not by force. I think it just costs too much and it’s not up to us to do unilaterally. I mean look at my initial argument  “I think they agenda from the start was to make a stable democratic Arab gov't to set an example for other countries in the region. Now we sorta screwed that one up big time...” I never said I agree with that. I just said, I think that was the agenda. There is no evil empire building scheme or anything. I don’t think that is a good idea in retrospect, though at the time I supported it. I think the goal of bringing freedom and democracy to the world is just unrealistic. It’s like getting rid of poverty. We can’t do it on our own. I’d love to help the people of Iraq, Cuba, China, Iran, and other oppressed  countries, but I don’t think we should do that, because there is no good way of going about it. I think we should have let the German Empire win in WW1, and we should have never got into these foreign problems. Let the world figure its own problems out without us. It’ll be better that was in the long run 
Two chicks... at once... at least once in my lifetime.  Not fame, nor wealth and not even an Xbox360.  Just two girls, 0 cups.
Digg?
I think most of them are running on rage, it's very clean you know; but a bit hard on the engine.  Anyways, if a Breathalyzer test is good enough to arrest me for DUI then it must be good enough for vehicular homicide. And yes, I know, that's two different levels of severity, but considering that they don't need a warrant and the person only need be "alleged" I see massive abuse rights.  More likely then not they will have to either forcibly restrain a person who hasn't actually been proven to have done something and would not be dangerous except for the fact that 7 officers are attempting to hold them still so someone can stick a needle in them.   Or they may have to administer a sedative and that is way over the line and offers a very very easy way to kill some one.  Edit: I just realized I wrote the word alleged, I don't know if that's actually a word or not, but it seems to flow nicely, so, yeah.
North Korea has gone through a lot of trouble to create an image of their country for the West to see.  I can't say that they've accomplished much, but this video surely *undid* whatever image they meant to convey.
It's not arbitrary, it sounds like it is across the board for lobbists: &gt;He sent Obama a check for $500 before he knew of Obama's ban on contributions from lobbyists.  What's impressive is that he has principles, and actually stands on them.  After he is elected we'll see if he turns out to be just like all the others.  But come on, let the rest of us hope he might actually be a decent leader.
I would like to see someone else start a 24 hour news station without all the bullshit.
In reality, that doesn't matter for shit... just saying.
Thanks for that link. Very interesting article.
What would be the right thing in this situation?
Or he. It is certainly possible there is a thirteen year old boyfriend asking this question on behalf of a girl, or purely for his own interest.  "By the way, I found out if you don't eat for two weeks, we don't even have to tell anyone about this."
"The greatness of a nation and its moral progress can be judged by the way its animals are treated."   --Ghandi  alas. most of us are just 1 step up from monkeys swingin' on trees. advanced species indeed.
The rover would fix the R2D2 unit.  They'd be like SCVs.
The Amazing Atheist is a notorious asshole.  \- Another Atheist
Jokes on you, I don't have a girlfriend! :(
It's truly rare that I laugh out loud these days.  Congratulations on breaking that streak.
That's fucking PROFILING man...  On the other hand I think kiddyfiddler will be able to give you a hand...
I would think that what would make it a moral choice would be the choice between being a doctor and being a hitman.  Kid is really good in med but really likes the money and satisfaction from killing people.  I think the line is between altruism (helping people) and selfishness (doing what pleases you)
well can we get these guys to start submitting to it?
"suppose you draw a cartoon..." I think it's pretty much guaranteed you do.
That is excellent. I particularly like. "Did anyone else know states were so bitchy? Man, New Hampshire and Iowa are like, the popular girls. Michigan is totally a member of the chess club. And Florida? No one will even sit with Florida at lunch anymore."
they report, you decide if its propaganda.
I wonder if there is a longer-term benefit to the Hillary controversy.  Her refusing to budge keeps the focus squarely on the Dems, McCain seeming almost irrelevant.  It in effect shortens the window in which Obama, the presumed victor, is visibly campaining against McCain.  In the meantime, the Democrats are getting all the airtime.  McCain is barely a footnote.  I feel there is somehow hidden value in this arrangement.  Don't get me wrong tho, I still have a fantasy that involves Hillary and a baseball bat.
British intelligence answers "Not before we have yours".
"It would have been best if instead of stripping away all the delegates, they took away half to begin with."  Rubbish. The party shouldn't dictate when states can hold their primaries. The notion that Iowa, New Hampshire etc. should have some special privilege to go first and disproportionately affect the outcome is perverse.  If the morons at party headquarters hadn't been so precious about the primary schedule they wouldn't have been in this "impossible" situation in the first place.
That is a very ambiguous question. Phrasing it to be a moral dilemma would be more along the lines of "Should he choose the path of the doctor, knowing full well he can save lives based on his skills, or choose the path of classic studies for his own pleasure and enjoyment." That's a moral dilemma, i guess, in a very very loose sense. But then, it isn't the choice that makes it a moral issue, but his intent.
More like "Great, where do we find a hot coconut shell?"
you got yo asses handed to ya
They retort, and deride...
Ctrl+Shift+R for those who don't know.
cycling alone on that highway and you would quickly become roadkill,there are some pretty insane drivers.
You're missing nothing.
&gt;Our military capability isn't all it could be at the moment and attacking Iran while you have 100k + troops in a volatile neighbor would be ridiculous but not impossible. In all seriousness you have quoted the received wisdom about the potential for an attack on Iran.  There is the probability that Israel/USA are thinking about an air and missile attack. I do not remember when the drums of war have been sounded so loudly without a war then taking place. As to your opinion of Joscha Fisher, you are of course entitled to it even if others do not share it. I am less concerned with the messenger and more concerned with the message. 
The arm can dig through concrete. Well not dig, scrape.
Just after my granddad passed away I stumbled on the website to add your name and a message to the disc and left him a memorial.  It's nice to think that DVD will hold his memory forever and he will be part of all the amazing things the probe will teach us.
I see you took playing house seriously. Tell me, were you a modern yuppie couple or did you echo the neo-classic '50s era nuclear family?
**Like this**?   Neato
What a wuss. Is Obama going to resign from the Presidency when things become "controversial?" If he can’t stand up to his pastor how will he stand up to those terrorist dictators in Iran and North Korea? This man is NOT fit to be commander in chief. On the other hand, this is a very good move for Obama as he staves off the Muslim view of him being an apostate.
well, right. But youtube, at least, is a 'site', and in the more general sense, people understand 'the internet' to be the carrier of youtube, skype, and torrents.   The battle lines will end up being drawn over 'blessed' and 'un-blessed' streaming sites.  So the pitch will come down to 'do you want to watch jerky stop-and-go media on current.tv, or do you want to watch smooth HD stuff on Hulu' ? (Swap in canary of your choice for current.tv).
I didn't learn how to properly wash my butthole until a girlfriend taught me when I was in my twenties. Lots of parents are ignorant.  Schools *should* be involved in teaching basic skills that everybody needs to know.
That has to be fake.
I knew he was a Muslim!!!  The video I saw on the internet was true!!!  /sarcasm
NOT web_design.
That's because they *were* [using](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Image:Apollo_11_crew_in_quarantine.jpg) modified Airstreams in the Appollo era.   They call it the [AstroVan](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/AstroVan) though.
&gt;"It's worth emphasizing that our junkaeological dig unearthed no whiff of scandal."  To me, being a paying member of Focus on the Family, an organized hate group, *is* a whiff of scandal.
It isn't necessarily like that.  It could be that by not taking money from lobbyists, one would be saying he doesn't accept money with strings attached.  But simple contributions as a show of support are always welcome.  For example, the "money bomb" posts/encouragements that are on the front page of reddit every few weeks. 
WE watched 300
Enjoy having cancer from the asbestos! There are purely banal reasons why most buildings are abandoned.  Not this one. Playing around in a decaying building stuffed with asbestos is a really, really bad idea. 
"The decision was a blow to Hillary Rodham Clinton as she was on the verge of watching Obama make history as the first black Democratic presidential nominee" - Does that even make sense?
defending your nation is completely different than genocide.
I'll get right on that.
I think they were hint-threatening that they're going to make a Chicago '68 out of Denver...which is ridiculous, seeing as how Hillary protesters are about as intimidating as a mall cop...in a garter belt.   If they feel like they've been disenfranchised, they have no one but Hillary herself to blame.  She and her staff are entirely too smart and politically savvy not to have foreseen the consequences.  Ridiculous.
I think the fact that the internet is an international "thing" trumps any attempt to apply any single nations' laws to it.
What's funny is that Ickes was present and voted on the initial decision to strip Florida and Michigan of their delegates.  Guess which way he voted?...He voted to strip.  This wasn't an issue on the Clinton camp's radar until they realized that they had lost.  
There is also Bageloid, I had a bit of a shuffle with him recently.
That is very susceptible to attacks that fill your database. I've seen it done a number of times. No fun.   Also, users can take very long to confirm and by that point you've paid so much in marketing to get each user (huge amount in some "niches") that it's just not worth it to throw away users that take longer than a few days to confirm.  Your long-url aversion seems quite odd, btw...
No, it was never considered at the Federal level. It was the [city of Los Angelos](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Master-slave_\(technology\)#Controversy).  (\*snort\*, I had to "escape" the parentheses in that link.)
perhaps the lesson of the 2000 election is:  don't ever ever ever stop whining.
If I don't trust yahoo enough to install their browser bar, why would I give them this level of control?  Install anything? I don't think so!
Unfortunate that this had to be done, but less unfortunate than the tasteless intrusive media coverage that made leaving the church a necessity for the candidate AND the congregation.
I'm quite intrigued as to how on earth this has (at time of writing) got 133 up votes and 52 downvotes. I fully understand the upvotes, but why did 52 people think this wasn't worthy? It's about politics and it's in the politics section so they can't be downvoting for that. It is clearly very important breaking political news (I'm not American and I fully appreciate the importance of this). The title isn't inflammatory and clearly supporting one side. It links to a proper news page rather than blog spam... Honestly, I'm baffled. Is it just because 52 other people have submitted a similar story and want their one to be top or something? (Sorry for going off on a tangent, I just find it quite intriguing)
Cute, But they should have made it an XP blue screen instead of a win98 error.   
&gt; We currently have a (mostly) free market that ensures network neutrality,  Except that it doesn't. See what Comcast and others are doing to BitTorrent, *right now*.  &gt; once you let government in to regulate it, you can be sure that special interests will lobby until they get their pet regulations into the law.  There's no "letting" the government regulate something. Congress either chooses to regulate or it doesn't. It's not as if passing one regulation will "pop the cherry" and suddenly *everything* goes. The "special interests" (a term that basically means "people I don't like") are *already* lobbying Congress to regulate the Internet -- and they've been successful.  &gt; It will start with 'protect the children', and it will end with 'RIAA lawyers say they suspect this might be somehow related to the allegedly illegal copy of ...'.  You meant to write that in [past](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Children%27s_Online_Privacy_Protection_Act) [tense](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/DMCA), right? Or was that your point: since we've already got the worst excesses of government regulation that you can imagine, we have no more need to worry!
based her and the audience member's [field goal is good] signals, i have to assume she won the distance competition 
I live in FL - the only Obama -anything- during the primaries were the bumper stickers. 
Same here.  I think that stuff is awesome - some of it is gorgeous, some of it is just cool.  Maybe I am not "broken-in" enough; I only became a wife in February.
Reading the whole thing is a waste of time!   I demand a short, sensational title to give me a version of the facts that will lead me to immediate outrage.
If it wasn't for the fact that it would do irreparable harm to everyone and the fact that Child Services will no longer speak to me after 'The Incident' I would call up child services because that is (seriously) the kind of upbringing that raises sexual predators and serial killers .
Yeah, I thought the page was broken, so I left without even trying to click anything.  I don't think I'll bother going back.
Even slaves were counted as 3/5. Count ALL the votes! &lt;/AlGore&gt;
The colonies have to either be fully connected to Israel, or evacuated.  They are simply not self-sufficient in any way, shape, or form, so cutting them off from Israel's power, water, sanitation, and defense would spell certain disaster for all the colonists.  Most would not choose to stay and would leave, an effectively incomplete evacuation, leaving a meager yet sizable number of religious nutcases who would start stealing supplies to survive, and creating problems until some sort of Waco-like event happened, which would be a disaster.  The world has such a long history of these militant quasi-religious breakaway sects and the one thing we've learned is not to let them fester in solitude and paranoia like we did the Branch Davidians and Aum Shin Rikkyo.  They attract more psychos and dig into their land like ants in a hill.  That's why a full evacuation has to happen and they need to rejoin Israeli or American society, preferably combined with lots of therapy and medication.  I don't want anyone to be killed, even if they "deserve it."
FCPA is going to assrape them, if Treasury and ICE can't get to them first.  Edit: This is the most insane thing I've ever seen. We lost to these mopes?
Hmmm, speaking of [which...](http://nsfw.reddit.com)
omg, i need new eyes now.
Hillary did a fundraiser there, and Obama aired a few radio ads.  They're both tenuous grasps at the idea of active campaigning.
zing! you must have a white pointy hat.
Whitey lives in the suburbs now. Detroit is keeping Detroit down.
Major agreeance with that, yo. Took me a minute to figure out there were more pix.
The VOTERS did not break any rules.
She's just making sure that Obama loses to McCain so she can get a shot at 2012.
[Wikiquote](http://en.wikiquote.org/wiki/Galaxy_Quest#Guy_Fleegman) FTW!
He stopped at the behest of Michelle as a condition for her agreeing to the pursuit of the Presidency.  
You'd be surprised how much the programmers/owners of popular sites can hate their users:-)
omg, I know it.  Like he flashed - and was laughed at.  :D
Actuary tables tell them how likely someone is to die, not how likely they are to be happy given a certain prognosis.  The woman in the iron lung was quite happy.  The variety of human life that is possible to retain happiness, everything from a junkie whose happiness comes from a needle to a nun whose happiness comes from tricking hungry kids into thinking God will provide for them, is as varied as there are people alive.  Any attempt to say "in this circumstance, no one can be happy" I believe would be utterly wrong UNLESS you can prove that the biological basis for happiness (pleasure pathways in the brain, etc) cannot, under any circumstances, be stimulated and the part of the brain that perceives pain and suffering is being regularly stimulated.  In that case you can say it is impossible for them to be happy.  But in no other.  In every other case it would be possible to help them to be happy.
I think everyone agrees that Hillary is smart.  And ruthless, slimy, mean, etc.  I think she is fully qualified to be president.  I think she would actually be a good president.  I just don't like her.
The fact that he owns Fox "News" does make them quite surprising however.
I'm half happy.
Cooler in my opinion. I like that it's a little self contained package, powered by the water flowing through it.
Have you never had an [open wound?](http://www.medterms.com/script/main/art.asp?articlekey=11768)
Mentioning that name on reddit is blasphemy.
Sounds a lot like Metal Gear 4, maybe Kojima actually based the history on this (at least the "moral" part, like for example "man/men dying for his government" in MGS1 and "The government  controls the information" in MGS2, I haven't played mgs3. But this is one of the reasons I love mgs, it sets it apart. 
Consider the amount of sex that new bunny couples have.
asbestos is fucking dangerous stuff.
Some Portal fans have been [here](http://photos-d.ak.facebook.com/photos-ak-sf2p/v197/173/36/645326567/n645326567_707323_4316.jpg)
There is some good in the city. The bad outweighs the good, though. Detroit's trying to make a comeback but it's like a car with three wheels.
cancer?
off topic, but i've taken to putting my dryer lint out for the nesting birds.
Absolutely.  She no longer is fit to hold any kind of public elected office, especially given how she is in the pocket of the ultra-Zionist Lobby.
They had to. The alternative was to throw the votes away entirely and risk a massive non-vote protest in the general election from the angry voters.  This was the only option they had.
Right tools for the right job.
&gt; Lots of parents are ignorant. Schools should be involved in teaching basic skills that everybody needs to know.  Why? Because you say so? Lot's of people don't live the way I want them to. Should I petition the government to indoctrinate their children in middle school? I'll take my schools sans the nanny state.
Thank you for pointing this out so politely and for your understanding that not everyone is somehow instantly omniscient like yourself. Thanks again.  I find it heartwarming that five people had the grace to vote my question down (indeed, what was I thinking? Asking a *question*?! **Not knowing** something? The audacity.) and that three lovely Reddit users displayed their appreciation of your kind words.  Edit: I don't so much mind the post above; It looks like its author has a [communication issue or two](http://reddit.com/user/Kingslayer/), so I won't hold it against him. It's the way the voting system's used that I find a little bit pathetic.  Edit 2: Hate this post? Find that it hits a nerve, or just think it's inappropriate? See [my explanation](http://reddit.com/info/6lkic/comments/c046zr6) to understand my motivation (and for more chances to vote me down, you hypocritical, anal-retentive twatsandal).
More succeed than fail. News only covers spectacular failure.
Oh, we were only supposed to be *playing*!? 
Are you sure your from this planet? Ur too smartz.
No but look at their definition:  &gt; a man made system of rules, beliefs and traditions whereby humans make themselves acceptable to God and earn their way into heaven.  They believe in the divinity of Jesus Christ, but they *don't* make any statements about rules, necessary beliefs, or traditions whereby they earn their way into heaven.  This is what I'm talking about: you see "Christ" and define "religion" whereas they don't define themselves as religious without specific rules or statements about how to be acceptable to God.
Count them chads...
Oh wow, a misdemeanor!
I don't usually respond to trolls, but I think that both you and who you quote are confused. I can't speak for all atheists, but I personally find religion interesting in the same way anything that is difficult to understand is interesting. If the majority of the people around me thought that Zeus and Hera were the true gods, I would be discussing that and how ridiculous that is, especially if I was raised to believe that. Christians like to think that their particular delusion is special. Well it's not. It's just more prevalent and nearly all christians will be the first to tell you that all other religions are ridiculous, but theirs, no of course not, that's serious business for no better reason than any of the rest. I'm tired of christians claiming that anything that disagrees with the christian religion is persecution. When christians are afraid to admit their belief and it is nearly impossible for a christian to be elected to a public office, then we'll talk about persecution. Edit: spelling/grammar.
Neat, an opinion piece filled with massive assumptions.  I won't hold my breath waiting for any of that to happen though.
Clearly you haven't seen the movie "Evolution". If it happened in the movie, it must be true.
Cockmongler grew a pony tail!
Me too. Some things you just can't unsee.
Get out the Kleenex.  That movie was, I think, the first movie I ever saw that made me sob.  Not just cry, but absolute sobbing.  With happiness oddly enough.  It taught me that movies can be much more than entertainment and might in some way be responsible for my appreciation of films, especially ones that most people would not usually classify as "entertaining".  (And its odd, but I VERY rarely ever cry at even the saddest of movies, but if it's a really happy movie, on come the waterworks.  Especially if it involves kids.)
I don't think he will Tuesday. This week, though.
Fake. No teacher would record their error in a letter to the parents. 
Lol, that's more than enough. Just as one big paragraph it's hard to read. Double return gives one line break.
In a loose sense. I can imagine that this could be considered a moral dilemmas of the general form:   X has a positive societal value, Y has a negligible societal value. X also has negligible personal value, while Y has a large positive personal value. Should an individual forced to choose between these options choose X or Y?   Admittedly, you have a rather poor example of this scenario, but it still coutns as one, I suppose.
...use of photo editing software.
Why not link to the actual artist's website, instead of a blog that ripped the pictures?  http://www.liquidsculpture.com/fine_art/index.htm
If Obama wins the Presidency, there won't be one to speak of.
[alopecoid](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=06JUfkiMOVc)
Maybe they put the expected life time especially low so that everyone is then surprise when they exceed it (and therefore they get more funding)   It's like in that Star Trek movie (or was it episode?) where Scotty explains to LaForge that when the captain asks how long it will take to repair the war drive exaggerate it so that when you get it fixed faster everyone is impressed. (Okay, I butchered the Star Trek reference... Trekkies are welcome to fix it) 
If we did this, we'd have Hillary.
Baby Reddits coming soon?
Good to know!  I knew someone would look that up :)
In Eindhoven they were not only anatomically correct, but they were hanging out in the mall windows with barely any clothes on. FTW.
If Hillary shows this much respect to the rules while campaigning I wonder what she'll do to the constitution.   
Yes, let the handicapped shoulder the costs of development ... then the military can adapt it for their use at a fraction of the cost. Great idea!
&gt;Why? Because you say so?  No, because we need to live in a healthy society with healthy people in it.   Nobody's denying your right to home-school your children so they won't learn anything you don't know.  The idea of sending kids to school is to give them the opportunity to learn things their parents don't know from qualified professionals.
In this case, only the few detail obsessed Redditors will be confused by the meaning of "ice". The other 99.9% of the people will understand they probably mean H2O since that is the primary mission of the lander and ice pretty much refers to frozen H2O.
power man is still cool
Leaving a church doesn't mean leaving a religion.  And I'd rather have someone who can decide when it's time to take drastic measures than someone who burns all their bridges at once, like our current administration.
I'd say it's was right around the time of FDR. That's about the time when government decided it could do whatever it wanted to the people and Joe Nobody doesn't get a say. 
Yeah, Bush's approach - using hundreds of thousands of gallons of innocent American, British, Polish, Spanish and Iraqi blood to create those subtle red hues on the desert floor are heart to beat.
I'm arguing against you. You said that all censorship violates the First Amendment, then I replied saying the First Amendment only prevents censorship by Congress, then you said that by my argument local governments would be allowed to censor, and I said that that used to be true, but after the Fourteenth Amendment and *Gitlow* it no longer is, but censorship by private entities on things that they own is perfectly alright by the Constitution.
Don't run. The policies are too fast to out run. When we make a break for it I want each and everyone of you to try to get to your private jet.  I won't lie to you, we all won't survive, but if we all try to get away at once, we might confuse it.   on 3 1 2 3 Go go go!
A common mistake. The market does not equate to democracy because only people with money matter. More often than not, the people most damaged by corporations externalising costs aren't actually consumers.
Obama aired TV ads on cable (with permission from the DNC) that reached FL because the networks couldn't selectively black out certain states.
They aren't 'off the shelf' d-cells.  They have screw-together connectors, as that was the only way to deal with the high current and heat.  IE solder would just melt.  I believe Panasonic makes the batteries, but doesn't sell them to individuals.  Though it does make it possible to replace individual cells.  
Oh dear.
are you sure that's not your unborn twin?  blehhhh
He wasn't on the ballot because the state broke the rule so there was at the time no point for him to be on there. 
new jersey douche bag strikes back XD
And comparing them to European standards is even more amazing.
Shall we tell her?
Maybe al-Qaida's view towards females isn't all that bad.
Having officially entered the "real world" with a fancy new corporate job, I'm find that it's not much different either. Talk gets you almost as far as talent.
It's pretty apparent to me that the parents have no idea who their kids are or what they know about sex.  The teacher may have provided some useful and practical information about sex education - but I'm sure it paled in comparison to what the kids have already learned from the internet.  
I don't know either but people do this constantly. I think they're either bots or retards...  SHOW YOURSELVES RETARD BOTS!!
In the submitters defense, it's not their fault IE decided to use the alt attribute as the tooltip box.
"I slept in my clothes, because the last time they came, I was in my underwear with my dong hanging out and shit," Defiant said of a past raid.  Priceless.
No, Australia.
For too long children have been learning things in school. This must be stopped.
Yes. You should stop talking as though only Americans matter though.
1 km = 0.621 miles, miles have ALWAYS been longer than kilometers????  When I'm driving 110 km/hr American's can go the same speed at 65 miles/kr
Isn't that what the subreddits are?
The Democratic Party is a private organization. They should have full control over how their candidate is selected. The primary calendar has been carefully structured so that small, diverse states are first so that candidates with little name recognition and little money actually have a chance. If the DNC had no control over the calendar, we'd be deciding our nominees three and a half years in advance, and Hillary (the candidate with the most money and name recognition) would be the nominee this election.
No, *you* pay the fee.
....but the VOTERS did not approve!  Signed: A fucked by the DNC Florida voter.
Obama should go out there tomorrow and concede all of the delegates from Michigan and Florida.  The math still won't pan out for her and he can come across as the real winner.
Add sports...
Or, those over 50 are part of an older generation to whom religion was far more socially important.  It wasn't until the 70s that prayer was taken out of Canadian schools.
Perhaps it my perception of what my own subconscious is. Psychotropic drugs have been known to take you willingly or forcibly there, when you have self created blocks that won't allow you to dive into such a place. That is just one method but it is start. 
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/This_too_shall_pass
I disagree that patent have a place in health care (which is what pharma is about). R&amp;D costs are covered by you and me; it's the marketing that's costly there.  But that's totally off topic.
oh, we probably shouldn't tell them what is going on in the middle east then, eh?
If you run from them, they'll chase you down and eat you alive. It's best to back away slowly while making yourself look big.
pics are unavailable when i clicked the link
In China they would get an award for hacking a US website. And free tickets to the Olympics.
What makes them sophisticated? 
"The Flesh of Christ"  They are masters of subtly.
Right now, I would settle for Thunderbird not asking me my Gmail password every three minutes.
For what it's worth, a while back I sent a letter to the DNC pleading with them to abide by their censure of both FL and MI. There has to be some way to keep order, to punish rule breakers. Going back on their punishment even sends the wrong message to children about the consequences of their actions. Not cool!  The voters of both FL and MI have every right to be pissed, AT THEIR OWN DEMOCRATIC LEADERS who decided to break the rules, not the candidates or the DNC. Without rules there is nothing left but chaos. Look no further than this mess.  Having new primaries is really the way to go... Paying for this should be the punishment of the Democratic leaders who screwed the pooch. In the future, I suggest that the Party leaders responsible for any similar breech of rules do jail time rather than punish voters themselves. I'm pretty sure this would halt any future temptation.
Is it just me, or is the gun going THROUGH the Ibex?
Ickes is up an arms about a loss of 4 delegates in Michigan. Never mind the fact that she's closer to the nomination (although it's still mathematically impossible for her to win it) than she would be had the sanctions been upheld. No pleasing these people.
Will Manly, a reporter for the Hays Daily News and The Stir has a little gem circulating the States via email titled Dear Barack: You’re wrong about small towns. This article is in response to his original article.
Congress is too busy investigating Baseball Players and writing checks to give to Iraqi's. They don't have time for this stuff. 
Who the hell, is Salinger.
They want instant access to ALL data.  It's the job of all people everywhere to prevent that from happening.  We must not let society devolve into the government enforcing their laws absolutely.  They do not have the right to determine what people do with their lives as long as they are not violating the rights of other people.  And they have already gone FAR beyond that.  It will only get worse.  You may think that is just pessimism, but think about it.  We've got over 500 legislators in Washington, DC.  Their job is to write laws.  If they ceased to write laws, their constituents would vote them out or see them as useless and maybe cut their exorbitant salaries.  To balance that, we have a Supreme Court that tries to make sure unconstitutional laws don't get enforced.  That's 9 people.  So, 500 versus 9.  And the 9?  They only meet a few times a year and hear a dozen or so cases.  The 500?  They meet almost year round and pass thousands of laws and resolutions every year.  The future is clear.  More laws.  And more laws means less freedom.  And, contrary to what the politicians would tell you if anyone ever had the balls to ask them when we'll have enough laws, there really is no constantly growing need for new laws.  So new laws will necessarily stray further and further outside of the bounds of the constitution and into the realm of personal freedoms.
Pregnant belly simulator.
yeah I don't know where the poster got Mississippi.  I had no intention of watching a video about cooking burgers in grease...but no, memphis doesn't either.
The problem with this is she isn't counting caucus states into her figures. If you count caucus's then she doesn't have the popular vote.
The DNC rules state that you **automatically** lose 50% of the delegates for moving the primary up.  Nothing prohibiting more from being barred.
&gt; And I'd rather have someone who can decide when it's time to take drastic measures Obama has been with this church for 20 years. Is that not enough time for an Ivy League educated lawyer to conclude that the pastor and parish are a bit nutty?  Sorry, but Obama's character judgement is not excusable. The time to leave Trinity was years ago.
wtf, how did it get it in in the first place?
When was the last time p3do posted here?
WHERE ARE YOUR PAPERS?
The question is what do we want to be happy in life. To be happy in life is, in my opinion, not what a person should be looking for.  Some times we are happy. Some times we are not. When we are happy, our interpersonal relationships improve; we go outside and do things, gain life experiences. After we are happy, those things stay with us. When we are unhappy, we look into ourselves often sacrificing relationships and activity. But after we are unhappy we have learned something important about ourselves.  If this doesn't resonate with you, I apologize for using the second person. I don't mean to say that that is what happens to everybody or that that is all that happens. What I am trying to say is that people who strive for happiness lose out on some good stuff.
How do women compete?  Can't they just fake it?
which is where the church should be if you ask me.
Is that you, [Raptor Jesus](http://www.encyclopediadramatica.com/index.php/Raptorjesus)?
That's because the government is a social construct that we use to protect ourselves from baronial / monarchical wealth. It isn't a business, and isn't supposed to be. Talking about it as though it is a business is playing directly into the hands of the people who are currently corrupting it - hence my echo-chamber comment. This is what you are doing now - you're arguing for the selling out of your own society to wealthy interests. Good luck with that.
The major political parties should be subject to antitrust actions.
It's getting crowded under that bus. His grandmother, his pastor and now his church of 20 years. If the Obamessiah is elected president I expect he will throw the entire country under the bus.
I was a middle school science teacher, and my own students caught me teaching outdated/wrong facts at least twice.  I was really proud of the kids who caught those errors and promised massive amounts of bonus points to anyone who could bring in credible information to show that I was teaching incorrect facts.  That spurred several of these kids to do a ton of their own research, which made my job even easier.  Any science teacher who is afraid to admit that they are wrong before a class of little middle-schoolers shouldn't even be teaching.
If you have nothing to hide...   ... you won't mind the daily colonoscopies.
WILD AND CRAZY IDEA...  WHY DOES THERE HAVE TO BE ONE SELECTION?  WHY CANT WE VOTE IN NOVEMBER FOR WHOMEVER WE WANT?   Stupid. We're still running this crap like it's 1860. Anyone with me on trying to MODERNIZE the election process?
No, they could have funded a revote after Feb 5 ... like now.
I'm just trying to explain what I think religionisalie.com is trying to say.
I think it's backlash against how so many young women are choosing to become slutty whores as a result of being liberated, and therefore are no longer marriage material, but are narcissists and don't accept the consequences of their behavior and think they deserve a princess wedding even though they don't deep down believe in their vows. How's a man to know?  Well, if she's a virgin, that says a lot and is one of the only checks one can make objectively.  It's not fool proof, but it's something.  That said, I don't prefer virgins, but I sure as hell expect full disclosure from any chick I've ever been serious with.
Alexa is a flawed metric, especially for reddit.
Oh good, so I'm not going insane.
true, out of all the things they pass off as news, a guy who claims to have actual video of an alien is one of the more newsworthy things.  More so than [denise richard's opinion on charlie sheen's new wife](http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/24882883/). At least there's a chance this could be interesting. (i know i'd like to see the video). Also he's trying to make some law, that's newsworthy.. especially if it passes.
One could start a bum army by giving all the bums (they are everywhere) five bucks and a cigarette. When I drove limos, they would incessantly ask for change, cigarettes, etc.  When the clubs would close for the night, bums would be lined up asking for change. I never gave them money, but once in a while I'd give 'em a smoke or let 'em clean the empties out of the back. When the superbowl came to Detroit, I don't know how they did it, but the city made the bums disappear for the entire week..after everyone left..things went back to normal.
Lovely.
if it is, then i dont know whether thats incredibly clever, or just plain sad...uhhh saw FIVE? ya its sad.
Does anybody else think Ron Paul would be an *excellent* running mate for Obama? Or am I alone in thinking so?
This is funny. Scroll down to the comment form below the story. The captcha on the form has a speaker icon that will play the text for visually impaired users. Listen to how it reads the text. Is there anybody who would be able to understand that audio? 
Here is the script for how this went down.  DNC: "MI doesn't count.  It's a fake primary."  Fast Foward  DNC: "Just kidding, MI was a real primary and you're a sucker for not knowing that at the time.  Here's some delegates to shut you up."
They think she was treated unfairly because she's a woman. I am _not_ making this up!  Hillarybots scare me a lot more than Obamabots. At least Obamabots have the excuse that many of them are young. Hillarybots are just batshit crazy.  I'm an Obama _supporter_, btw, and I really have no problem with Clinton _supporters_. It's just these nutcases who are having an undue amount of influence.
Yah, but how does he get down?
[Lobbyists represent real Americans](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=24pDGQF6UW8)
Come on - all this fanfare and drama aside, we all know how much respect all three of the candidates have for the Constitution: none.
zing
I like where I am, I like my life when not at work. I have the perfect situation for me, as far as love life is concerned - a long term partner who values his privacy and basically his alone time as much as I do. A 2 house couple is the only situation that'll ever work for me.  Down side - work. I left a well paying job for more interesting work, and after some pottering around with different projects have eventually accidentally found myself in the same damn situation - well paying boring work.  Also I could do with making more friends. I've moved away from my closest friends and haven't put enough effort into finding replacements.
You have instantly become my hero of the moment. Relish in it.
I posted this last time and I'll post it again.  He was the lead in George Romero's "Monkey Shines".  Not a great movie but memorable.  Even if that's all he ever did in his entire career, he'd still be a celebrity to me. 
Barack now needs 66 delgates to secure the nomination. This resolution increased the number of delegates needed to clinch the nomination to 2,118. Here is my math for how the remaining primaries breakdown:  **Remaining Primary Elections**  Sunday, June 1:  * Puerto Rico 63 (Pledged Delegates up for grabs)  * Barack 37%   23 (Number Barack is likely to win)   Tuesday, June 3:  * Montana 24 (Pledged Delegates)   * Barack 52% 12 (Number Barack is likely to win)   Tuesday, June 3:  * S Dakota 23 (Pledged Delegates)  * Barack 46%  10 (Number Barack is likely to win)   **Totals**  * 45 Number of Pledged Delegates Barack is likely to win from the remaining primary elections  * 66 Number of Delegates needed to secure nomination  * 21 Number of additional Superdelegates Barack needs to win
She's over rated.
[insert vote counting joke]
You can.  It just wouldn't be the most effective maneuver.
them vaginas sure are tricksey. 
Probably nothing worse than the guy we have now.
Haven't you been following the news? Apparently the only reason she lost is because she is a woman.
A common mistake. The market does not equate to democracy because only people with money matter. More often than not, the people most damaged by corporations externalising costs aren't actually consumers. It's not a trillion dollars it's 3 trillion - and it hasn't been burned, it's been given to corporations... and this has happened because these corporations have corrupted your government. The solution to corporate corruption of government is not to completely abandon yourself to corporate power. Nothing I said has anything to do with centrism or statism.
The Pakistani is likely a Muslim yet the headline writer uses a Judaic concept (scapegoat) to describe the scientist.  Ironic or oxymoron-like?
The state Democratic parties are under the umbrella of the national party.  Just like ACLU chapters, Boy Scout troops, and girl scouts.  If the national body has no power to maintain order among it's local organizations then here is no way to maintain a cogent organization.
All that bleach and shit? Newspaper might be okay, but the inks are a little toxic. Not sure whether composting first would help.
wouldn't that technically be "israeli offense"?
How about just providing us with what we are looking for or downloading?  Why do you need my email address or some other "registration"?  Im probably never coming back to your site again anyway.
Perhaps he has always disliked what his pastor was saying, but never bothered to leave the church simply because he grew up as a member (for example).  I sure he disagrees with what his pastor says, and now that it's becoming an issue for him has finally done something about it.  Well, that's what I hope at least; I don't see how any rational person could agree with that man.
10929385029x the fun, with 1 over the same number of brain cells.
It's called "the gentle shocker"
anyone who thinks what they do is "genius" is usually just average.
Yes. But so is the alternative.  (Shall I throw away 10 million dollars on treating an 80 year old's cancer and thus not spend it on making sure thousands of poor children get vital nutrients? I write an exaggerated example to make the point easier to see, but it happens on a smaller scale every time resources are misallocated... and you _guarantee_ misallocation when you refuse to think rationally about who needs how much help, at what price. Medicine is not a good place for "nice" people to be in; "nice" leads directly to suboptimal resource allocation, which leads directly to more misery and death than was actually called for. "Nice" is a phenomenally dangerous concept.)
If he hadn't done it, comments at Trinity would have continued to become a focus of the media and of supporters for Clinton's campaign.  As Obama noted in the press conference, the media and others have been harassing members of Trinity for some time now, trying to get dirt they could fling at Obama.  The general public would continue to wonder about his loyalty to a church which, as you say, has a 'minister screaming and yelling.'  
I'm assuming a lot of super delegates were waiting for the decision today before declaring allegiance.  I'm hoping that a majority of the undeclared hash out their support by tuesday.
I fail to see moral dilemma. However I see that question is based on assumptions about future. For example in question it is assumed that if the student becomes a doctor he will save lives, that's not necessarily the case. If he doesn't like the job he might not become doctor (after all you don't just chose to become a doctor), or he might become a bad doctor and do more harm than good, or he might become a good doctor and save life of a tyrant that will be responsible for death of millions. And the same applies to classics, if he likes it he might make important discovery or hell know what else. The only thing that I can assume about the future is that the student will be more efficient at what he likes, and therefore his work potentially will be more beneficial to society.   But if we assume that the student knows for **sure** that if he becomes a doctor he will do more good than a classics major, then the only right choice is to become a doctor. In that case it does become an interesting choice, should he chose something that is beneficial to him or to society, and then it's his choice. If the question is "What career choice should the student make?", the answer is: whatever choice he makes.
Not to mention just like in a windows environment, most programs show the short cut on the menu bar.   Great ripping of the *guru*.   You missed these:  *it's now possible to get just about any Windows program up and running on an Apple computer. *  With either Parallels or BootCamp you can run emulation or a full blown windows O/S.   *Macs remain a niche product.*  How about some supporting examples?   *But why should locating the "on" switch be such a struggle? Just stick the thing where I, and my employees, can find it: right up front*  Grandma, is that you? Seriously, this is the complaint? You can't find the fucking power button?   VPN access is very standardized, surely this guru can find an alternative? (Lol, on GoToMyPC.) You can even use windows terminal services in OS X (released by MS) if you have Windows servers.   Mozy is somehow the Mac's problem?   The desktop isn't 'quadrants' (in fact I don't recall this being a windows feature at all, but whatever). One can configure spaces however they like (I personally use 3 side by side).   As far as option/command/alt um ever heard of the internets?   Nice bullshit stat made up as well. Maybe 20 out of 100 companies. WTF is this author's fucking deal. What if you develop Windows applications. Why would you ever move to a Mac?   Worst article ever. I do however still prefer the windows way of writing special characters. Probably because I've used them for 10+ years and the apple shortcuts aren't embedded in my brain yet. For a new user the apple way seems easier (and works on a laptop without a keypad as well).
I should also mention that in Canada we believe that anyone should be allowed to believe anything, whether it be religion or atheism. Saying things like "75% are delusional?"  is not acceptable.
Wow.  300x400 images.  Spectacular.
As far as I can tell, rights four through seven are still in effect.  Also, I don't think they would have put the right to bear arms on there if it was being written today.
No, it doesn't.  Edit: Turns out your the same person I replied to before.  The DNC rules state you **automatically** lose 50%.  The DNC is more than welcome to strip more.
She hasn't lost yet. Like she said a few weeks ago, she can hold out hope that Obama might get assassinated before he formally gets nominated. Other than that though, you're right, she lost. She is totally despicable.
dangerous to use drugs, but if done properly can be a helpful window.  meditation is good too.  music, always a plus, but needs to be the right kind.  what drugs? i never tried acid, though i wish i had when i was younger (30 this year). marijuana was incredible for me, but haven't used in years.  after a while though, you learn to plant self-hypnotic suggestions into your subconscious, and after a while longer, the process becomes something close to a conversation, albeit a mumbling one, with both sides attempting to speak from vastly different contexts, and struggling desperately to understand the other.  your experiences?
Oh, c'mon... It's like saying: "A Hurricane hit Myanmar last month. It was in a different time and time window than all the previous ones. SO WHAT?"
   Some of that drivel gets posted here! Then if you aren’t ‘leet’ enough, some self-righteous /. reject deletes your comment.  Pissed off you have to work a Saturday? 
rawstory.com = crap ...too busy and hurts the eyes. 
from what I got the amendment to push the vote up was attached to a election reform bill(you know so there is a paper trail next time the vote gets hijacked) so it was either vote to have paper trail and fuck up the primary or vote to leave the election in FL up for grabs to the highest bidder.
Yeah, hopefully it's as painful for them as it is for us.
Intolerance of poisonous and contagious stupidity is good. Your religion deserves no mercy.  An well trained open mind requires *fresh evidence* - neither a rehash, nor something with no evidential value - before it deems an update necessary. A mind that will update on flimflam and fairy tales is as insane as a mind that refuses to update.
Nice.  Seemingly post apocalyptic.  I concur with the complaints about interface.
Nope, no evolution going on here.
Number 1 scared the hell out of me... but nice pic!
The immigrant population of Canada is nowhere near 75%.
2000 flashback.  scary.
And people wonder why I take full advance of my Irish citizenship?  But I am sure the fbi can track me through my national insurance number anyway.  I can try though
Looks good...  Seems like it would be useful. May be somewhat similar to http://webcast.berkeley.edu/course_details.php?seriesid=1906978500 but appears more complete than Berkely on the software side. Note: it fails to explain how to make NAND gates (a step lower level).  I think that extra step is quite useful for that complete overview.  2 lectures at the Berkely URL deal with that: "Intro to Synch. Digital Systems" and "State Elements"
pwned
Yes, because the FUCKING THING SUCKS.
How can creationists look at stuff like this and still think god loves them.
Its the trash or the toilet...
I'm not in it for the "mods", baby.  &gt; Had I noticed your comment   Point is, you wouldn't have. If I have to sacrifice some "karma" to shake it up a little, so be it. I'm sure I'll survive that horror if I take it day by day and try not to think about it too much.
It's interesting... there was a tornado around here recently that caused a massive amount of destruction. Many, many houses were destroyed. Six or seven people died. As a result, there have been a lot of stories about the tornado miraculously missing someone's house. Hello? Are you aware that your god just flattened an entire town? A tornado missing a house isn't a miracle. It happens to most houses every day. So I'd like to add one to this list:  God was good to us!  Translation: "God likes us, but he must sure hate those people to have destroyed all their earthly possessions."  Acceptable response: "Amen!"  Unacceptable response: "God was a dick to those people over there though!"
So, did they get 'em fixed?  They've only had six years to do it.
Our governments are social constructs that we created to protect ourselves from monarchial and baronial power.  Trying to make out that it's "just another type of corporation" that has a "monopoly" misrepresents what it's there for. I think you misread what I said by the way.
It appears as if the internets have offended you. Anonymous sincerely apologizes. We hope you get your internet points back, and that they restore the length of your cock.
this would've been the best solution, but imagine the "OPERATION CHAOS DUH DUH DUH!!!1!eleven!" blowback from oxy-limbaugh and his fans.  lets just let this mess die, it doesn't get better from here.
Not just distance but accuracy as well. 
I have the same problem on google reader.  Fucking Annoying.
Why isn't it good? Because of your own prejudice and intolerance for other people's beliefs? 
Should have been 3/5 just to be asses. [Context](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Three-fifths_compromise) for those who don't remember your history.
How would you watch that exactly? Hidden cameras?
That's what she gets for marrying a Muslim.
It's important to remember for the general election that the Republican party did the exact same thing.
i think that's an ass simulator.
Reddit recently linked a TED talk saying that metastatic cancer cells circulate in the blood for a full year, on average, before starting a new tumor. Filtering them out could stop metastasis. Maybe this filter would work for that too.
nice pit sweat.
&amp;nbsp; DAMMIT
Quite a shame this had to happen, after listening to the sermons that were so easily sound-bited it just seemed like sound Christianity-based logic. (On the assumption that it's true, which I disagree with, but still.) A move that probably should have been made sooner, but alas one that was inevitable.
Interestingly it seems Kuwait isn't too happy with us based on some of their actions which I didn't even know about until reading this article on the Saudis. Their (Kuwait's) resistance to our stance on any political uses of sovereign wealth funds (whatever that is exactly) and then especially not pegging their currency on the dollar recently. Hell we started the first Gulf War for them basically and they allowed for us to use their land for both Iraq wars so this seems like quite a break from previous relations. Then again I'm comparing them to the Saudi's and the Saudi's seem pretty cool with going right along with the current administration. 
There is no master. Mast**U**rbate.  Moron spellers like you literally give jacking off a bad name.
I don't like cyanide and happiness.  edit: This is one of the better ones, but I still say Cy&amp;H sucks
No doubt. One page of *meh* photos and bullshit about screams and blood, then 6 pages of promises to return soon. The thread is now two months old and locked. *zzzzzzz.....*  Early tip-off to the bullshit--the google books link someone posted had an uncanny resemblance to the OP's own description of the building.
The moral choice is to continue with the classics. Morality is being free and acting freely without infringing on another individual's ability to do the same. That is, if he chooses to be the doctor because he is coerced by the notion that this will be the greater good (utility) then he is making an immoral choice. He is limiting his own freedom or society by coercing him is limiting his freedom. In either case, becoming the doctor is immoral. It is only moral if he actually wants it. But since in your example he wants to study classics then he should because this choice does not limit anyone's ability to be free, including his own.
The reason there is a primary season is to give voters time to understand how candidates will deal with special situations.  An Iowa farmer is not the same as a NJ resident commuting into NYC.   Having all the primaries on one day distills the process down to "Which one is more appealing to look at"
that forum is pretty nuts. people getting time outs (lol enough already) for not capitalizing letters! what the deuce.
Nothing better either. Think on that.
Mexican violence is out of control due to the US's drug consumption and the US's lax gun control.  Relaxing gun control in Mexico is not going to help this. 
Well...  The delegates don't *really* count since Obama wins anyway.  This is to appease the FL people come general election.
Shit, are you the girl in that photo?
Original Smash Bros.  Daily.
*******************
I think there is some constitution left to shred. and if there isn't you could always light the pieces on fire. &lt;/joke&gt;   In all seriousness though I don't think Hillary would infringe on rights she would just take millions of dollars from corporations to make sure they "have a voice".
It is beyond my ability to comprehend how someone could voluntarily take time out of their lives to stand around and shout on behalf of hillary.  I just can't imagine anyone even tolerating her, much less working themselves into a frenzy to scream and rant like fools on television for her.  The only motive I can understand would be if they were paid protesters.
I guess even Hugh Heffner would say "Wow" if he read it. 
&gt; Right now no one has the power to require sites to have redeeming value where as if legislation was passed saying ISPs are not allowed to discriminate against websites based on content all it will take is some lawyer to convince a judge that content only refers to material of some value and therefore they can legally block spam sites with no redeeming value like icanhascheezburger.com  What? ISPs most certainly have that power right now. If AT&amp;T or Comcast decided tomorrow to block icanhazcheesburger, it wouldn't take a lawyer convincing a judge to allow them to do it, *they could just do it*. Neither their customers nor the site itself would have any legal recourse to stop the block.  Under your supposed characterization of net neutrality, limiting access to the net would require the approval of a judge. Sounds like a damned good idea to me.
Thank you. That was exactly the type of response I was looking for with this submission. I wish I could upvote you more. I really like this format for dealing with christian clichés.
I was hoping for a treasure map!!
Then that is the issue to address, not the knee-jerk assumption that everything will be better if we hand all vital infrastructure to private-interests (aka baronial/monarchical power) that we formed democracies to protect ourselves from in the first place.
Ah yes.  Can I murder my baby by starving myself.  This is where we are with abortion.  Its legal, so why not?  What other things could I do to get rid of this human being inside me?  Maybe I could wait until 8 months, and just reach up in there and snap it's little neck like a toothpick. The joys of "pro-choice".
/
much easier to fathom these days with the plethora of fisting vids
yes, nearly all of the kids did it.
Normally instant access costs $29.95/mo for the restricted *ahem* sites I want to visit and have that offer. Tell the DHS to buy a subscription to England like everybody else.
Are you talking about efficiency vs. cost or *just* cost. Batteries are the cheapest form of portable energy, even though their energy density is not the highest (CNG is 200x better). Nuclear powered cars will probably be the best (millions of times the energy density of Li ion batteries), but will also end up costing 100x as much (wild guess).
True - but the Foundation's first name is Google.   The thinking was that the goodwill the prize generated would rebound to Google. What Google didn't count on is the same is true of the ill will.
&gt; mm/dd/yyyy started because it's been common in English to write May 31, 2008 and fits this format.  The May 31st, 2008 is not standard English, but American English, both written and spoken.  '31st of May, 2008' is generally what is used in the British English. 
&gt; behaving more and more like tyrants in this country, imposing their values on us  Oh, piss off. They are not imposing anything on you, you idiot. Gay marriage is irrelevant to you, because you're not gay.
Don't mention the war! I mentioned it once, but I think I got away with it.
As I read this I am eating eggs and drinking ale.  woo
Just wait til we have sliced bread in a can!
Worst name for a major consumer computer system ever.
Reminder that most of reddit exploded when a teacher began discussing his personal religion with his class
I hear insults are the most effective way to persuade people.
Hmm I wonder how many of her there are out there.  She may be crazy, but I bet she votes.
Because you pay for it. And if the company is providing vital infrastructure, your taxes underwrite it. Why do you think that corporations are so desperately keen on privatisation? You (yes you) cover the risks.
But at least he likes Obama!
Yeah... keep in mind "nothing worse" is some pretty damn low standards. ;-)
I know he's good at guitar but when did John Mayer become considered a guitar legend? 
[useit.com](http://useit.com) 
when her platform will be botox.
And people opposed to the death penalty are all murderers.  People opposed to search and seizure without warrants are all hiding drugs.  Did it ever occur to you that some people do still have principles and ideas and can hold beliefs based upon reason and consistency with those principles rather than a simple dumb "I want the crap I do to be legal".
What a wuss. Is Obama going to resign from the Presidency when things become "controversial?" If he can’t stand up to his pastor how will he stand up to those terrorist dictators in Iran and North Korea? This man is NOT fit to be commander in chief. On the other hand, this is a very good move for Obama as he staves off the Muslim view of him being an apostate.
This is like asking where leprechauns go after they find the pot of gold.
True, but it'd be nice to know how the market, such as it is, will be headed. I don't want to be left out of the loop for a few weeks, even, if current sources run dry.  i.e. bring a towel
Still, you gotta agree that its pretty fucked up when the media forces you to divorce your own pastor, and then divorce your own church.  I think its pathetic.  However, I think I prefer a candidate with no church.
Wow it's every episode of Lost, ever.
More interesting is that a candidate (Obama) not even on the ballot in MI got rewarded with 59 delegates.  (they were cast as undecided).  In this case, the proper thing to do would be to send the delegates (59) to the convention and let them decide, not the decided by fat men in smoky backrooms (well, not fat, but certainly crazy -- Need I say Dean?)
"Teacher, what's a rusty trombone?"  I would prefer my children's teachers not answer this.  Obviously, the laws need to be changed, but until then, this is the consequences of civil disobedience. You gotta roll with em
People who don't want to have a baby are going to accomplish that goal, whether abortion is legal or not.  The question is: would you rather it be done with sterile tools in a doctors office, or with potentially dangerous methods such as fasting, coat hangers, etc...
considering that it's unlikely that the programmers who have created sites without the automatic redirect (imdb for example - those bastards!) are probably not subscribed to programming reddit, this can basically be seen as a 'fix' of sorts...  The other way to do it is to open the login link in a new tab, and once you're logged in, refresh the original page.
We need more truth in media. Please check out http://infowarsmoneybomb.com and donate to get Alex Jones a cable TV network that can get stories like this out.
Yeah, in the abstract you can make it sound deeper. But at some point that line of thinking fails to scale down.  Another scenario we got was something like  &gt;A friend is in the hospital. You know that she is in a time of need and you have free time - but you don't particularly want to go visit her.  That situation is likewise pretty amoral.  One should think about these sorts of things in terms of personal ethics, I think, and not morality. What kind of person do I want to be? Rather than, What is the morally correct option?  It's not the particular question, I suppose - it's just that this is a class on morality and we've been getting these sorts of questions all quarter. I don't think they're morality at all - ethics, perhaps.
[Karten bitte](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EHXl89-cGsE)
Shit. 14 is the age of consent here and I wouldn't dare do something like that. Teacher? Alcohol? Staying nights? At 14?  A teacher (a privileged person with power over the minor!) providing alcohol to a minor (illegal!) in order to get her drunk for sex (pretty much the definition of rape!) ... This woman is a serial rapist. I wouldn't be surprised if a guy got a life sentence for doing the exact same thing.
&gt; i'm proud of being american, fuck  This is evidence of what professionals may call a learning disorder.
I think the only way he would be pleased is if they gave all of FL and MI delegates to Hillary and perhaps made Obama drop out.
Sorry, after decades of being told by other males they wish they had followed my path in life (wifeless, childless) due to the horrors females put them through, I wouldn't ask a female for a date for any reason!!!!  Today's females, the vast majority, anyway, in MY opinion, are not worthy of a male's attentions.  Simply too dangerous. The entire "game" is skewed in the fenale's favor; from the legal system to charitable organizations to divorce courts, you name it.  A female can destroy your life and strip your wealth with one mere accusation, even if it is a false one.  Ample evidence to back up my words in MY opinion. A Google session with the proper search terms will offer a horde of evidence.
Why not have it be both!  "Or C# files to pack into a better .jar!"
Support free speech! http://infowarsmoneybomb.com
it is good to see the democrats tearing themselves to shreds.
There are no winners on reddit.  We're all losers.
That's about how it went.
I totally agree.  I grew up in a smallish city with a conservative population.  Everytime conservatives tried to mess with books or artwork displayed on the premises, the librarians would stand up and not take any of their shit.  Several times a year there would be an article about the librarians kicking conservative ass.  I will always respect them, and still have something of a romantic fascination with them.
We need these stories to get out to the public through the TV networks as well.  Support free speech! http://infowarsmoneybomb.com
I'd like to work with wood.  While computers pay the bills, I'd much rather spend my day building something.  In the short term, I wish I had the funds to make a 4-axis CNC. But that will come eventually, just have to buy the pieces bit-by-bit.
The article compares Nintendo Brain Age, MyBrainBuilder, MyBrainTrainer, HappyNeuron, (CogniFit Science) MindFit and Posit Science brain fitness 2.0, and ends up recommending Posit Science for speech processing and MindFit as including "All the machines-a total workout". Patti Said of the New England Cognitive Center says that "This one (MindFit) was based the most solidly in cognitive science and what we think stimulates the brain." The first fundamental difference we see between a) Brain Fitness Programs such as MindFit and Posit Science on one side, and b) other "stimulating games", on the other, is the presence of credible assessments and clear, structured set of activities based on that assessment. Given that MindFit costs $149, vs. Posit's $395, and that it covers much more ground, we typically recommend MindFit as a first step.   
I'm not a big target at all, but I do need it. See: [http://ego.nuggit.nu/iplog.txt](http://ego.nuggit.nu/iplog.txt) I've cleared the log since then, but sometimes I'd get like 30 tries a day.
The intersection of the AOL h4x0r subculture of using pseudos to stay anonymous, and the Myspace subculture of mindlessly publishing all sort of private information such as pictures, location and connections is proving to be fascinating.  (If you're curious, the articles linked here provide enough starting points for a good half-hour of entertaining digging.)
Support free speech! http://infowarsmoneybomb.com
What's important is that she can still win in 2012.
Spelling bees make me sick.
I was almost going to give him a pass by virtue that really some businesses really *don't* need that much computing power or UI value.  All the noobism about his "tech guru" was laughable but par for the course.  But then he claims at the end that Windows Vista (properly installed?!) is all most anyone really needs! All credibility instantly went out the window.  If he had said XP, well, sure we use XP in Parallels in our business.   Vista?!  WTF?  There is *no* business that needs Vista - there are no performance reasons and there no economic justifications.
For anyone who has not used this database, it is spectacular.  I recommend using the CAS number for all molecules that you are searching for because the search engine is not as interpretive as google (IUPAC vs common...).
Support free speech! http://infowarsmoneybomb.com
Floridian democrats are use to having only half their votes counted.
I can't wait to start "printing" my own Jesus face toast!!! Put some peanut butter on it... Mmmmm... It's Jesustastic!
What's with the NBC watermark?
Why would he endorse McCain?  His platform has nothing to do with what the GOP stood for. It seems as if democracy is only allowed if you vote the right way.
I think she'd make a better president than the current one, but we've had crappy/mediocre presidents since about 1963 so I'm thinking she probably wouldn't be "great".  I look at it like this...  I was born in 1987. Six years after George Bush Sr. became Vice President. In all these 21 years of my life, the sitting president or vice president has been either a Bush or a Clinton. I do not need another 4+ of it.  The Bush-Clinton-Bush presidential administrations, IMO, range from being total failures to barely average. It is time to look outside these two mediocre political families for our commanders-in-chief.  Hillary as a person, I can't say whether I like her or not... but as a leader I'm fed up with these political dynasties. Historically they haven't done much for us so I say it's time to move on.
Support free speech! http://infowarsmoneybomb.com
&gt;I'd fill them in about 6 hours.   Only if you were copying the data simultaneously using 18 DVD drives.   By my reckoning it would take just under 4.5 days to copy that much data from DVD using a single drive, assuming you have three people working 8 hour shifts.
"Internal Server Error The server encountered an internal error or misconfiguration and was unable to complete your request."  Cool!!!!  Somebody ate the site!!!!!
That would make too much sense.  It would actually productively target things which cause harm.  No, we'll more likely see the laws that they've passed multiple times banning "virtual" child pornography where drawings and computer generated images that don't involve any real people at all are illegal.  They've passed a law making such things illegal 3 times now.  Its been struck down each time by the courts.  There are still people in prison right now prosecuted under those laws.  For having DRAWINGS.  If you read the laws or ask the politicians, do you know what their reason for apssing those laws are?  It's too hard for police to have to verify whether the subjects in pictures are A&gt; real or B&gt; underage.  So, since they'd have to actually investigate and gather evidence, they make it illegal to have things that "appear" to depict minors.  That way they don't have to verify you committed, you know, a CRIME.  They just bust you because of how something looks.  Coming soon, busting fatties for robbing restaurants cause they have some sloppy joe sauce on their shirt.
Who doesn't support this idea?  Support free speech! http://infowarsmoneybomb.com
Slowly bring the two front stilts together as he holds them in his hands or with a taut rope. He slowly decends to the floor, by scooting his hands down, inch-by-inch.
You have no idea of how much data spy-satellite collects on top of aircraft surveillance photography. Google Earth is nothing compared to what FBI, CIA, NSA, KBG, Mi5 and Mi6 acquired. Then there are other private business that collect satellite photos and use them to plot road, highways and such. Satellites orbit at an altitude of at least 100 km from the surface, there is no trespassing done there. Got something to hide? Then you will surely sue Google!
Genocide??????????????
So you refuse to buy apple products because the iphone lost marketshare in Q1 because many people are likely waiting for the release of the 3g iphone? Keep you vista shit and windows mobile shit and your shitty blackberry. You can pry my iphone and my macbook pro from my cold dead hand.
&gt; what drugs? i never tried acid, though i wish i had when i was younger (30 this year). marijuana was incredible for me, but haven't used in years. "On April 19, 1943 Dr. Albert Hofmann intentionally ingested 250 µg of LSD." The discoverer of LSD used it when he was 37 when he ingested that much of it.   &gt;meditation is good too.  Good to know. Still have to look into how this works exactly.   &gt;something close to a conversation, albeit a mumbling one, with both sides attempting to speak from vastly different contexts, and struggling desperately to understand the other.  I find this starts to clear up quite considerably though. I'm not sure how it has come to this for me but i have a feeling it has to do with how i always used to operate in a shut down like mentality. I would scrape the surface with all my questions and barely put my thoughts and questions to the test. I like to think of "Scientific Method" as my approach to my self and everything i do and or perceive, sometimes (i'd like to always, but sometimes it's funner to just go and worry about the mistakes later).   Marijuana has also been rather good to me. Once in a while (every 2 weeks or so) i will smoke an 1/8th or so of a gram and listen to music and draw or write. Something to make me force out something/anything that i didn't know/thought about from my inside.
If he would bring enthusiasm and fervor to the classics field, thereby influencing others (classicists generally teach college and/or publish), he could very likely make more impact in the field of classics than that of medicine--lots of people want to be doctors, many of whom may be better at it than he.  Not that I think it's truly a moral dilemma, unless his career choice is to exemplify Diogenes.  
&gt; NASA isn't one to jump to conclusions.  They can't even be dragged to conclusions when they have an overwhelming amount of conclusive data.
Im not so opposed to the parents' position. Dont we encourage parents to be more involved in their kids' education? How many times have we said "Well  the parents should have done something".  These parents are reclaiming their rights as parents, and I have to agree with that.  The school system should teach about reproductive systems, not about human sexuality issues. Questions on homosexuality is NOT a human reproductive issue.  Neither is masturbation.  You cant have it both ways.  Either parents get involved, or schools become responsible for everything. And I personally dont want a school committee deciding everything my child is to learn - especially when some of those things are politically or religiously sensitive.
I'm with you, and don't even have a conspiracy theory to back me up.
Absolutely.
Killing?  Isolation?  Create problems?  Nah.  I expect the Palestinians to round them up and give them trials for war crimes like rational people would do.  They may be show trials, but I don't particularly mind if the lot of the settlers get thrown in prison.
Explained.
Support free speech! http://infowarsmoneybomb.com
that depends if it was bacony and delicious ever
And yet it's very widespread that standing up for a principle and not compromising your intellectual integrity when discussing a volatile subject like child pornography is derided.  You prefer the witch hunts and lack of integrity of other places?
The official story of 9/11 is the following: on United Airlines Flight 93, passengers Todd Beamer, Jeremy Glick, Mark Bingham, and Thomas Burnett Jr. fought the terrorists, and the plane crashed as a result of that fight.  Well, it turns out that Beamer, Glick, and Bingham have connections to Israel.
They knew the rules had been broken and were voting in a tainted election. Voters could have protested before voting, or protested to delay the vote.   It's fair to assert that a lot of people didn't vote under the guise that it wouldn't count. But Hilary campaigned there and drove more of her followers to vote anyways. Michigan isn't even worth discussing as they weren't even both on the ballot, how is that balanced.  If you see this as anything other than Hilary trying to boost her numbers then you're kidding yourself. She would not have cared about this at all if she was already winning. This is 100% farce and nothing more, no justice was served today. It is abuse of rules to attempt to steal an election, which is becoming commonplace in our modern elections. 
Who cares?  He's a figurehead.
[scrape](http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/scrape)?
Can you cite a source where Obama doesn't respect the constitution, please?
Actually, Ive heard MS programmers say much dumber things than that.  I think the scene is highly accurate.  Shes probably just worried about losing her job and was looking for job security like most of them are.  Most likely, shes just trying to entrench the code base in more MS and link it with MS dependencies on all tiers so she doesnt have to learn a new lang and can remain head of IT.  Just like in real life.
Support free speech! http://infowarsmoneybomb.com
oh wow, greedy me, trying to... God forbid, sell a service/product!
I would like to help build such a station. We just need some rich dude to give us lots of money and we can do it ourselves.
###This is blog spam.  Please vote this down, and vote [the official vimeo](http://reddit.com/info/6lkga/comments/) link up.  Don't disrespect the Big Buck Bunny team's hard work by directing traffic away from it! I've posted the official Vimeo page instead, which has the added benefit of being in Vimeo HD.
She's over hated
The founding fathers wrote based upon principles.  Universal principles.  Those principles extend to ANY interactions between human beings.  That's the beauty of principles.  If they are correct and are consistent with reality, you don't have to worry about forseeing anything.
Cumbersome? I plugged it in and it worked straight away!
I assume it's from Jay Leno's "Headlines" segment.
Prize goes to best faker.  
Whoa.
What a tangent. I'm not talking about resources or niceties here, I'm speaking of the worth of a human life. So, what exactly is the worth of a human life? 
We watched Apocalypse Now.  It was fantastic.
It would actually be *immoral* for him to become a doctor... interesting.  I wasn't really looking for the correct answer, though. As I said, I wrote a paper detailing what all the major moral theories would have to say on the matter.  What I was saying is that it is all moot. The question is framed as a moral dilemma, but it is not (not to me).
LOL @ "diverse states". Iowa and NH are both mostly rural white folk.
None of this even matters.  It's very likely Obama is going to be the next president.  But what does that even mean?  What difference do you really think this will make?  I don't want to come off as cynical because I do believe there is hope for the future but it wont be because of Obama or anyone in the government.
What killed serious journalism? More choices, whether that means E.T., social news sites or other near instant news dispensers. When was the last time you saw breaking news on-line and said "I can't wait to see what take The New York Times has on this?
I take it you've never heard of the Communications Decency Act?  Or the Child Online Protection Act?  Or the PROTECT Act?
Make that: Swiss tabloid interviewed a conspiracy nerd two years ago, misleading headline posted on Reddit and Reddit readers still give it 80+ points.
What I'm saying is that I don't see how your system can't be easily circumvented automatically once someone specifically targets your site.  I have a contest site so it's a particularly attractive target, despite not being huge, and it's had a number of people target it specifically.
Sorry, your comments have nothing to do with anything I said. Does it bother you that in your (moronic utopian) view of the world, someone with two dollars has double the voting power of someone with one? Dollars aren't votes dipshit. Don't ever get them confused. 
It's odd to include, particularly as visually impaired users generally have a screen reader of some kind. I'm not disagreeing with the move, it's cool, but it seems useless no matter how intelligible the pronunciation is.
"An inadequate black male"  Jesus Christ.
&gt; I forget the Asimov title that explains this, but that was his argument, not mine, and it was a good one.  Naturally, having read Asimov since my childhood it was not lost on me. The essay was called the "Relativity of Wrong". Indeed, those with limited knowledge thought the earth flat, when with more knowledge it was held to be round -- yet there were those who still rejected the idea to the extent that Columbus' voyage was deemed near idiocy. This is a potentially *great* parallel for today's debate on global warming, because even as modern science builds its case there are those who still reject it. But lastly this was in my original comment a simple throw-away line to include several common science-denying positions and not as a serious point of debate, which I think is pretty clear. But Asimov is using this tale for a point:  &gt; What actually happens is that once scientists get hold of a good concept they gradually refine and extend it with greater and greater subtlety as their instruments of measurement improve. Theories are not so much wrong as incomplete.  This is precisely what is happening as we refine and extend our theories in so many fields: biology and neuroscience discovering how damaging pollutants and toxins can be even in small amounts, particular for infants, when in years past we painted our houses with lead paint and stuffed asbestos into insulation; how climatologists are refining their models to show demonstrably that not only is there of course the background periodic and episodic climate change of earth, but that the actions of humans, despite the incredulity of it at its face, considering the sizes of the oceans and atmosphere, are influencing this as well.  Asimov's point wasn't so much about flat-earth vs. roundish-earth (for there was also the time where we thought maybe the earth was truly spherical, when it is not) but in response to a non-scientists criticism of science for producing wrong theories (such as flat-earth and sphere-earth) and wondering when we would have cube-earth and so on. The point is that science is a process of refinement, and over the past few decades this refinement has been leading scientists to conclude that there is a human effect on our atmosphere, oceans, and temperature.  &gt; Such things are lost on those like yourself, those that would vote me down.  Actually, I voted you up, sorry to disappoint. But apparently Asimov's point was lost on you, which disappoints me, because I have long enjoyed reading your comments.  From Asimov's [essay](http://chem.tufts.edu/AnswersInScience/RelativityofWrong.htm):  &gt; My answer to him was, "John, when people thought the earth was flat, they were wrong. When people thought the earth was spherical, they were wrong. But if you think that thinking the earth is spherical is just as wrong as thinking the earth is flat, then your view is wronger than both of them put together."  Somebody *today* who is a flat-earther is wrong, and I am not ashamed or afraid to say so. Only time will tell whether in 1000 years the advances of science will continue to confirm or, finally, reject the idea of human influence on climate change. I won't be surprised either way, because I'll likely be dead. But also because I don't claim to have the answers. I can only go on what the best science of today is saying, and it's saying we should figure some things out about how we pollute.
Only if your definition of "moral choice" is defined by mises.org.
I hate hillary more than anyone. These votes should not be counted at all. But, I do feel the people of this country bear the burdon the idiots in charge place on them way to often.  This won't change the outcome of anything, might as well let the people feel good about themselves. 
Not only did she nail all those tough letters in "nymphomaniac" but her spectacular finish satisfied crowd and competitor alike.  
Can I ask which OS are you using?
There's a lot they need to prepare before they start doing random missions.  * Full diagnostic to make sure everything is functional and to what extent. * Exactly how much power they have to work with (how fast the solar panels recharge the batteries on the pole of Mars). * Exactly what the terrain looks like in the lander's direct vicinity (dictates which areas to dig through and establish a hierarchy of which are most important in case the arm malfunctions over time) * Develop a virtual landscape for the arm to work with since it's impossible to do something live on Mars. * Many others I'm not insightful enough to think of.
Even the alien!
No, I'm refusing to buy an iPhone because the drone in the referenced article ignored the fact that it lost market share. He simply said "Yeah, yeah... it lost. So what?". Losing market share is losing market share, it doesn't matter if you are Jesusphone or McDonalds.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yd5_nTwLVEg
never been to a "rave" huh?
Frederick Douglass (born Frederick Augustus Washington Bailey, February 1818 - February 20, 1895) was an American abolitionist, editor, orator, author, statesman and reformer. Called "The Sage of Anacostia" and "The Lion of Anacostia", Douglass is one of the most prominent figures in African-American history and United States history. In 1872 Douglass was nominated as the vice presidential candidate on the Equal Rights Party ticket with Victoria Woodhull, the first woman to run for President of the United States.  He was a firm believer in the equality of all people, whether black, woman, Native American, or recent immigrant. He was fond of saying, "I would unite with anybody to do right and with nobody to do wrong."
Not necessarily psycho, but apparently racist.  She seems to have taken a page out of Geraldine Ferraro's book.  Man, I hate being white.  Always being treated as less than human.
I think the party will learn from this and force a national "every state at once" primary next election cycle.
Au contraire, Professor. It looks rather like I've offended the internets! If Sherlock diverts his eyes a degree down he'll see that I'm not all too fussed about my own "internet points". Unless, of course, Sherlock's amazing powers of observation are a little limited when it comes to sarcasm.  Do you think that if I wanted "karma" I'd post "I want *you wankers* to see this"?  Perhaps, Sherlock, it is more to do with being disappointed by Reddit's growing appreciation of insults over debate.  Ah, at casual the glance generally offered to comments on Reddit (by me as well, I'm not faulting) it probably looks like I'm some dude who's pissed off over some petty downvote. For a few weeks I've felt the Reddit community shifting slowly from interesting debate to lolcats and insults, from friendly discussion to spiteful digs. More and more often I'm seeing people who ask valid questions voted down and insulted. And more and more I'm seeing members voting a comment down because  * they disagree with its assertions, while recognising that they aren't entirely invalid * they know it's right but it slightly lessens the credibility of their own argument(s) * it is a question the voter already knew the answer to  It is these shifts in the Reddit community's apparent collective mind that have irritated me slightly tonight.  You talk about how we shouldn't hesitate to go against the grain if our feelings warrant it. But god forbid anyone go against *your* grain, Reddit.
I read that today and got me sad. His parents were amazing, courageous and bold in creating that oil that gave hope to many and to new treatments!
You seem to be thinking rationally... stop that.  **"How can you call yourselves Democrats if you don't count the vote?" one man in the audience shouted before being escorted out by security.**  How do you call it democracy if you don't follow the rules intended to keep it democratic.  The simple fact is that they decided to go against the party and move up their election.  They were warned before that if they did it they would not be counted.  They did it anyway, and now they are fighting because it suits their wishes.  Hypocrisy != Democracy.
Oh god... Look at the comments on the bottom of that page.
yawn... next...
actually, that's Ludacris
i disagree with your statement that "everyone agrees that Hillary is smart." If that is the case, then there is no reason why I have been downmodded so much. Unless of course, the reddit assholes are full of spite again. Oh, redditors, I hate you so much
Pity. I'm not generally a fan of pastors, but Wright was a pretty cool guy.
Means your computer is likely **shit**. Follow their suggestions to lower details and get rid of particle effects.
Mormonism actually is a load of crap. everything else is details.
&gt; NASA, 2008: We may have landed on the moon. We are in the process of conducting further experiments to verify or reject this hypothesis.
You don't need an amendment to apply the existing clauses of the bill of rights.  Freedom of speech is there, and it a principle to be universally applied.  And our government, by the way, has done away with the amendment process.  There have been more than 500 calls for a constitutional congress backed by 4/5ths of the states which legally requires the congress to hold one.  They've ignored all of them.  It's a flagrant violation of the law, but they don't give a shit.  They are above the law.
Who are you and what have you done with Captain Obvious?!
dude that guy has gotten more pussy than most mortals can imagine
your teacher is a dipshit.
I tried various United States sex offender registries (including the Texas one) and was unable to find any registered sex offender named Kerry Smith Foulk...  Either she's so crafty that she got her public record wiped or this is a hoax.
Cynics don't need sources to back their claims.  Although anyone who's read a chapter of "The Audacity of Hope" can refute them, in this instance.
More official links:  [Youtube Version](http://youtube.com/watch?v=YE7VzlLtp-4)  [Downloads and Torrents](http://www.bigbuckbunny.org/index.php/download/)
*sign* you got downmodded?  anyway it's true. it's pretty much the same fucked up city that was maybe a thousand years ago. It's got to do with the communism bullshit that these people like. It gives them an illusion of freedom. sad because individually they are one of the most intelligent &amp; helpful people I met in India. No wonder Mother Teresa decided to stay back there 
velocirapture!
Mars?  I DON'T KNOW WHAT THAT MEANS!
we should elect presidents like we vote on Reddit stories.On second thought that would be kind of scary.
Obama is a man of serious faith.  He joined the church for political reasons, and he's resigned for political reasons.
You conveniently ignore my point about where they got the idea for the divinity of Christ. As long as they got the idea from Christianity, they qualify as a Christian sect. Their level of adherence to rules and regulations is irrelevant.
Most of her supporters will have forgotten her, or died of diabetes.
Because if two democrats are on the ticket in November McCain will be elected. Even if Hilary only got as much votes as Perot did in '92, McCain would win.
&gt; you're arguing for the selling out of your own society to wealthy interests.  I don't understand what that means.  ¿could you elaborate more?
Before people get unhinged... if your child was killed by someone who appeared to be drunk, would you support a mandatory blood screening on him, whether he liked it or not?  Hell yes.  Good ruling.  Even if he wasnt drunk, you have a full right to know the circumstance of the tragedy.
They say it like they're Republicans.
weak. ripoff of the much better Tim and Eric's   "the innernette"
&gt; will they HONOR the votes of the people and stop complaining?  I doubt it.
This can not be... Obama unites people, clearly this is CGI.
Duh! Don't you guys even know what a Gooey Interface is? I create them in Visual Basic all the time.  Me and CSI is l33t and you are all total n00bs!
Haha, awesome. 
That's like the time I beat a kid in a race when I had broken ankle.
So you're basically telling us that your hard drive is loaded with child pornography? &lt;ducks&gt;
try me again in a couple years when you've actually seen a vagina in real life.... kthx
I think if the US can't get Americans to support a war enough to get young men to volunteer to fight it, then we probably don't need to fight it.   Also I am afraid of these mercenaries. I am afraid they will be used against us. Like Caesar's legions were used against Rome. 
My comps not even that great and it runs fine.
Don't be so sure on that, popular votes from the caucus states aren't counted.  So there is no telling what the actual popular vote would be.  However, I go agree that this process is a little messed up, but we can't change the set rules halfway through the game.
Poor thing.
Since when the fuck did New Zealand become an 'ally' in the "war on terror"?!??!! Or perceived as such?  We heard something about NZ cooperation with the US, Aus, etc. in cybersecurity but WTF?  God damn :(
They elected the people that did. They should be bitching to them not the DNC.
If you supply software that needs to run on vista, that's why you'd run it.   I'm a software developer and I've moved all my company's applications to web-based. I don't even test in IE anymore. Firefox is our only supported browser since it runs on Linux, Windows and OS X. If someone has a problem in Safari or IE we'll try to resolve it, but it's not a priority.   My current application development project is in Flex so that will make even the browser less important. I love the direction development is going.
Yeah I'll continue my slow death march drinking down loads of delicious Slurm. Not cost effective sure, but what do I care. That stuff is the shit!
it's hilarious that he's depicted here as blond and white, even though he was from the Middle East
22 minutes ago  http://farm4.static.flickr.com/3249/2540318952_de74f07892.jpg
I see no basis to support your line of thinking.  The only possible action would be an attempted mass deportation of the remaining militant settlers, but given how the prior evacuations went they could not be accomplished without substantial loss of life, which is not something any government of Palestine is going to do.  They would end up asking Israel to come evacuate the crazy cultists, which in the end is the same thing as if Israel just evacuated all the settlements in the first place.  You project a level of petty revenge-like animosity onto the Palestinians that is simply not accurate.  It is accurate for the settlers, who have been indoctrinated into hating and dehumnaizing Arabs and Palestinians and believing they have a God-given right to kill them.
It's got to be a chocolate Jesus, make me feel good inside, Got to be a chocolate Jesus, keep me satisfied.
The internet is the last place where free speech truly exists.
The reddit one says "non-exclusive."
If your brain has infinite storage, you should be able to fit a bit more common sense into it. There are laws of physics limiting the amount of information that can be stored in a certain amount of space.
 It's nice to see you again IConrad, trolling the forums like the cave bat that you are.   Still going strong after a year are you. I applaud your tenacity in being a moron.
While legally you are correct, censorship in any form is quite immoral.  The example of putting up signs in someones yard is more a property issue than a speech issue, I'm thinking more along the lines of the MPAA, the ESRB, whatever organization puts those "parental advisory" jokes on CDs, etc.  The fact Walmart won't sell things they deem aren't 'family friendly', etc.  All perfectly legal.  All immoral and bad for our society overall.  Bad for business, too.  It's only ever enforced by people who have the most immoral impulse of them all - the desire to control other people.
I and my cohort within the USA have enough problems of our own; HERE.  Must be nice to have such a care-free life to be so worried about others on the other side of the planet.
I think he just isn't reading the great writers. That doesn't mean they don't exist. 
I'm a libertarian, but in all fairness, Joe Nobody probably was poor as fuck. 
Nor will I hold my breath waiting for your McCain blowout.  The numbers are on the Dems' side.  Obama is already polling ahead of McCain in PA and OH, and neck and neck in IA, MO, CO, SC, GA...
Lol, Alabama man strikes again.
Nor will I hold my breath waiting for your McCain blowout.  The numbers are on the Dems' side.  Obama is already polling ahead of McCain in PA and OH, and neck and neck in IA, MO, CO, SC, GA...
The way it works is, you send them $150 and they send you a pamphlet that cost them $0.20 to produce, which you then throw in the trash.
Yeah, I thought that part was pitiful. 
"If the Obamessiah is elected president I expect he will throw the entire country under the bus." Will it take 20 years?
You're acting awfully like their apologist. And not very convincingly, may I add.
Slow, laggy, and stupid interface.
Just XP with a patched UXTheme :)
this might be a little strong but I hate Homeowner Associations
You do realize no one who is pro-choice is actually advocating for 3rd trimester abortions, right? If you're gonna be high and mighty at least care enough to get your facts right. 
I imagine they'd monitor heart rates and brain activity if they wanted to truly be accurate. It's a lot harder to fake those things.
A castle isn't a 'big brick building', it is a architectural masterpiece, it was designed as a retreat or as a home for royalty.   It's like a Jewish person being fine with friends that eat pork, they even come round to the Jewish persons house. But the Jewish person does not wan't them eating pork in the house.  It's fine to have certain beliefs, but I do not think it's right to force people to accept your beliefs on their own private property. That just puts you in the same league as fundamentalists.
Just because they're dead doesn't mean they can't vote.
Ah, I could see that, with your site.  You're right that I'd be screwed if someone targeted my site specifically. I don't think that will happen, but if it does, I'll definitely have to think of a different way to do things. Do you use captchas then?
I thought it sounded funny too. It should say, "The decision was a blow to Hillary; Obama is now even closer to being the first black democratic presidential nominee."
Just reading that makes me want to wipe them out. 
I think this story is better :)  http://www.vbs.tv/video.php?id=823749185
Don't get me wrong, I am also happy the republicans are tearing themselves to shreds (some would argue they this is already done, but they still have a ways to go). Every so often, the nation needs it's politicians baptized in fire to ensure the will of the people is done. Even more rarely the nation needs to wash them away in their own blood for the same reason.
is it really easier to build artificial trees than just, ya know, plant some?
&gt; dude that guy has gotten more pussy than most mortals can imagine  And im sure that kind of thinking is what got him to that point. Im just saying then im sure he wont mind it if i rag on him since it seems 99.9% of the time everyones pointing out how deep and awesome he is.  no doubt he is, but cmon now, he wipes his ass after he shits just like me and you. ;)
I can imagine, on the basis that about 500 years ago Columbus discovered the new world  We extrapolate this to the inner solar system for the first 500 years, and the outer solar system for the second 500 years.  If travel speed does not increase significantly, then the inner solar system (including asteroids) is becomes man's domain in 1000 years.  Barring any discovery enabling FTL drives, and allowing a slower start due to longer transit times.  And assuming we don't shoot ourselves.
Explain to what you are referring please. Edit: Thank you for clarifying
I would think that a countries laws could only apply to their own soil, but America already breaks that.  They firebombed Panama and stormed in and arrested Manuel Noriega on charges that he broke US law.  IN PANAMA.  If you go to another country for "sex tourism", they can arrest you when you get back home.  I'm sure there are a load more examples that I'm not aware of.
I assume that this is a celebration of reddit's female population surpassing 2%.
It seems that no one else is acknowledging the article is from a 2002 link and the real guts it took for the newspaper to take a stand against the "post 9/11 world" paranoid twazzers.  Anybody know if the police chief made it to Los Angeles, if the Mayor is still in power, if the DA still has a job, or if the two writers have gone on to bigger and better?  /too lazy to open a search engine tab
Resigning from a church, how's that work?
*******************
who honestly didn't think this was going to happen ?
No, dúh. It's for "missions", like going to the store to pick up a newspaper.
No, and I wouldn't care to put in the effort to cite you a source.  The fact that he is the democrat nominee, per se, is enough. He's advocated executive and legislative policies that are beyond the powers provided to the Federal government by the Constitution.  If you really care to see which those are, take his positions and compare them with Ron Paul's positions on the same issues.  Any time obama advocates doing something that Ron Paul wouldn't, there's a high likelihood that it not respectful of the Constitution.
aren't those usually fake? sucks the funny out of this one if it is...
nice... link to original flickr photo?
Yeah because that will fix our massive fucking deficits.   Taxes aren't bad here. Ever notice how many companies get started?   Plus if you cut that tax guess who else gets the tax cut. Oil companies and every other fucking big corporation that is subsidized by the government.   How about the government subsidizes my fucking startups? Oh wait, I don't need it.   Idiots.   *SOME economists think that these effects are strong enough to make a corporate rate cut self-financing.*  Are these the same assholes that said the Iraq war would pay for itself? How about those that STILL fucking believe this bullshit of supply side economics as the one and only solution?   Wait, yes it is: *N. Gregory Mankiw is a professor of economics at Harvard. He was an adviser to President Bush and advised Mitt Romney in his campaign for the Republican presidential nomination.*   Two fucking losers in a row.
Yeah, I think it's about time to toss them out on their asses and show them they are not appreciated running (ruining?) our affairs.
How is that a gaffe? Lobbyistsd _do_ represent real Americans. People with lots of money are still real Americans.
Very true, people may not like that fact and downmod you for mentioning it but under Saddam they had no way to show their displease with the direction of their country without signing their death warrant by doing so.   As much as I have always opposed this invasion and occupation, that doesn't mean their can't be positive things that come from it. 
I really wish they had declared that MI and FL superdelegates get no vote, rather than half a vote.  In both states, many the people behind moving the primary up and causing this whole fiasco in the first place were people that are now superdelegates.
upvote by proxy
Bicyclists Behaving Badly
[hmm...](http://img206.imageshack.us/img206/2621/kalkuta194535vt9.jpg)
Bet the hotelier of the hotel watched all of the Fawlty Towers episodes
I don't know.  You do have to mark captured locals as final, but that's about it.
No need for the hostility. It's an innocent and harmless mistake to make, considering the phonetics of the word.
Bless her heart.
Wow, that is like a book practically, but a really good one. Saved for later.
U.S. Christians suck.
I agree about your point regarding layout, not technology. But:  &gt; It could just as well be plain html if you wanted to degrade the user experience.  My user experience is degraded by the use of Flash. No urls in my status bar, no middle-clicking on links. At least text is selectable, I'll give it that much. 
Especially the Japanese, Italian, and German immigrants that were locked up for the duration of WWII, and had all their belongings confiscated.
I think these pictures prove that evolution is a sham.  Just by looking at them you know they were designed by someone/something tripping on chemicals.
The DNC was willing to pay for such a caucuses but the local party officials denied to perform them.
"Proud to be Red."
I thought that Reagan had some good moments. Even the first Bush did.  Carter, maybe not.  I didn't like Clinton, but I have to grudgingly admit that he did some good things.  And, yes, the current Bush is a disaster.   But I agree, it's time for someone new.
I think Hillary could be dangerous if she had to decide whether or not to go to war.  After her crack about RFK, I wrote to my senator to say that if Hillary gets the nomination, I'll support the Republican candidate.  McCain doesn't have to prove he's a man, but Hillary does.
So what?
In a sense expanding government bureaucracy is income redistribution. Each government job provides a job and a salary to a person who needs both. That is why there were so many job creation programs during the depression. So I have never minded a government bureaucracy as long as the rich are taxed to pay for it and it does something at least vaguely useful. 
I think that the 'pretty amoral' descriptor is right. There is a seed of a moral question, but is is pretty weak. I can see there is definitely a case to be made in there being a moral issue in that question, but the example isn't particularly striking. I'd say that such questions in the abstract form are more interesting.  I would agree with you in saying that your prof needs to buck up and improve the curriculum if that is all you get.
Oh come on folks.. this was the most clever comment yet.  Give this guy some points for Christ's sake.
Jesus, I need to become a cop.
He's living poof that you can accomplish anything with enough self-determination.
Five months of watching his back is bad enough. Imagine four years.
Well, here's how it goes.  That's MY mayor.  And that's MY Police Chief.  And I'm NOT leaving Portland, unless maybe I spend more time at my house in Eugene.  And my Governor, well, here he is BRAGGING about being a Zionist. http://governor.oregon.gov/Gov/speech/speech_030805.shtml  So, YES, as I sit here and stare at the $65 receipt for a tank of gas, and the refusal of my liberal congressman Peter Defazio to support the impeachment resolution because he 'has better things to do" I repeat; this has become a VERY fucked up country. And I don't owe it to anyone to move to North Korea, you fascist pigs.
Another act of war against the freedom of information exchange.
So it's not efficient... it just produces stuff so cheaply and in such great volume that it creates the illusion of being efficient?
Well, that certainly justifies ruining the rest of his entire life.
they occasionally churn out a jem :(
I think some are intentional or either the mistakes are intentional to get on the show (the fine print ones in big ads stand out). Its probably a combination of that for the ones that seem fake and then actual ones mixed in there.
how about "frozen water"?   :)
Do henchmen count?
Nationalizing railroads and making them useless combined with massive subsidies of roads/cars put us where we are with co2 emissions. My point being that nationalizing for the "greater good" is actually what causes the problem more often than not.
That sent such huge ripples through the animal behavior community when it was confirmed.  Kind of funny in retrospect.
What Ickes really wanted was for Hillary's allotment of delegates to go to Hillary, and the Delegates bound to the anti-hillary vote (since she was the only name on the ballot) to become free floating supers, which would ideally swing to Hillary.  Cleary, this is a ridiculous notion, but it's just about the only metric still favoring HRC's scorched earth campaign.
WAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA bitch
It catches you, then gives you a firm pat on the back.
It was a joke. ^^
There are plenty of people on Reddit who vote based on approval instead of merit. They haven't read anything about voting and assume it's a popularity contest. *There's also the contrarians and those that view Reddit as evil and attempt to subvert the voting guidlines and just be pissy bitches.
Now all you have to do is paint beautiful and imaginative paintings! Well, that and go crazy. 
He'd probably sell his mother if it made him money.
Downvoted only because having you in this thread makes me very uncomforatable :-\
What's ludicrous is that Hillary signed an agreement to recognize the DNC's decision to strip FL and MI of all votes.  Only after February 5th was she supposedly concerned about disenfranchisement.
Interesting.
Ali G says you gotta stimulate the clit. I think that's in her butt.
Uh no.  Conde Nast may own reddit, but the people who made reddit into what it is say it is with a lowercase.  Can we have a reddit admin here?
I was there and found the experience fun!  Sure it wasn't the safest thing to do, but it brought quite a lot of attention to cycling in the city. There were people waving traffic to slow down to cause a jam before the cyclists merged.   And now I can say I was on the front page of that "newspaper" the Toronto Sun :P
The Reddit agreement is pretty much standard fare for a site that has a lot of user generated content.  You keep your rights to your content, but using the service grants the service license to use your content as if it was their content.  The Digg agreement is significantly weird.   You lose all rights to your content.  Period.
[Hell of a mug shot](http://www.kfdm.com/news/guilty_26235___article.html/teacher_indecency.html)
I was thinking there were some ominous tones to that sentence... Lower oxygen consumption and heart rate? An easy way to do that would be for it to simply kill you... Wait for it... WAKE UP SHEEPLE!
Not the easiest way to cut weight, but it appears highly effective.  All kidding aside though, that is one of the cool things about wrestling: you can a disability that might keep you out of other sports and still kick ass at wrestling. I've seen several amputees as well as one blind kid all wrestle competitively at the high school level. Some of them even went to state championship contests.
As a teacher myself, I learned early not to guess.  A wrong answer just makes you an idiot and cheats the students.  If a student asks me a question, even when I know the answer, I ask if any of the students can answer the question.  If nobody in the class can answer, then I give the answer or explanation.  If I don't know, then I say so, maybe hazard a guess or two, elicit other guesses, then tell them I'll look up the answer and tell them the next day.
Nice cop-out. Just admit you don't know shit.
slimy and stinky.
Yes. Don't visit them.
there's a river called Willamette, but the newspaper circulates in a city called Portland.
Google has to work on its automatic translation services. I have a feeling the article takes on a whole new meaning in the original language.
&gt;Can somebody explain the chemistry/physics of this one?  Yes:  Electrical impulses, begun in the brain and transmitted down the spinal cord, instruct the diaphragm to relax, which in turn causes the lungs to contract.  This raises the pressure on the gas inside the lungs, which causes the gas to be forced out of the body via the mouth, in order to equalize the pressure with that of the outside world.  While that gas exits, other electrical signals originating in the brain cause the vocal cords, tongue, and lips to move in certain ways, which imparts a characteristic shape to the pressure waveform.  This waveform is transmitted via the atmosphere to the mark's ear.  The mark's eardrum begins resonating along with the waveform, which causes electrical impulses to be transmitted to the mark's brain.  Finally, these electrical impulses cause the mark to hand money to the person whose diaphragm relaxed.
The capital of Dallas is 70 degrees; with lows of 42.  
The ruler appears to be broken into 3 large pieces, thats hardly 'shattered'.  Similarly, 'non-shatter' (usually referred to as 'shatter resistant' these days) glass, generally will still break if you hit it hard enough, and depending on the force, and particular method of shatter-resistance will either break into lots of small pieces that remain held together in a flexible sheet, or break into a few easily-managed large pieces.
But fewer and fewer people are flying because it costs too much so I hardly think they really need the runway. Also I feel sorry for the people who will lose their homes not to mention the village of Sipson, which will be obliterated if the planned third runway goes ahead.
http://www.cnn.com/ELECTION/2008/primaries/results/candidates/#302
what hope?  She threw that away long ago.
If its impossible to have a health insurance company without bureaucracy, then you are asking for the impossible. If it is possible, then the first one to remove it will get significantly more customer satisfaction and will be able to lower the price.  But if that's possible, then why hasn't it happened yet? One answer could be that the fucked up bureaucracy is caused because of government regulation, but I don't know about that.  Either way, the company charges you more than it takes them to produce what they sell. Given that that's the case, they are producing value, not wasting money.
I've seen a ton of all caps comments and those people were not banned.
&gt; I can speak for all atheists  can't?  &gt; but I personally find religion interesting in the same way anything that is difficult to understand is interesting  Atheist here, and I agree. That's two of us.  &gt; Christians like to think that their particular delusion is special. Well it's not. It's just more prevalent and nearly all Christians will be the first to tell you that all other religions are ridiculous, but theirs, no of course not, that's serious business for no better reason than any of the rest.  They also like to think that their particular denomination of that delusion is the "correct" way. The Catholics and Protestants still disagree, some claiming the others aren't "real" Christians. Even among the sub-groups that are quite similar, though, interdenominational dislike can border close to hate.   *All* religions fracture and split into multiple sects over time. You don't even need to look at the beliefs themselves to find examples of how Christianity is similar to other religious systems.
REXX was actually my first programming language.  It's a fantastic beginner's language because it makes easy things easy and has a simple-to-understand syntax which resembles English.  For example, in my opinion, REXX's compound variables are slightly easier to understand than arrays, and `say` makes more sense than `print`, as most computer users associate the word "print" with something other than writing to stdout.  That being said, these days I would probably recommend something like Ruby or Python for a first language as they make it easier to transition from simple procedural programming into OO and functional styles.  Not to mention that nobody uses REXX any more.
I would sue for the retraction.
Let me sum things up for you.  A: "If you give, you get something in return."  B: "But I've given so much in life. To pretty much everyone. I've sacrificed hours and lots of money. For little to no gain."  A: "You can't look at it *like that...* You can't quantify these things. You give, you get back a warm and fuzzy feeling inside."  B: "Okay. So if all I get is a warm and fuzzy feeling, how about I just spend these extra hours and this extra cash on pot? That gives me a warm and fuzzy feeling as well."  A: "But you're not contributing to society!"  B: "I contribute to society through various semi-contractual exchanges: work, shopping, poker playing, raising kids, etc."  A: "Well..."  B: "Could it be that what you're feeling is just an evolutionary instinct to contribute to the herd from a time before roles, role models, and the like?"
I was pretty stoked for the dude until I read the retraction.  
Agreed.
Sure, but a screen reader is not going to be able to read the text in a captcha. That is why I try to avoid including a captcha on the forms that I build. But I can only take so much spam, so sometimes I give in.
The good thing about Obama is that he doesn't seem to be too much into religion. The president should stay neutral not like Bush who praises God all the time.
At least she's honest. I'm still voting for Obama. 
He, amateurs. I was about to complain that the site didn't work.
That was my first thought.  
Whoever is running his campaign is a moron.
let me guess: you are not married
 Don't sweat debating with this moron man. He's Reddit's regular cave troll. Strong strong bark, very little real bite.   His biggest asset: unlimited bile and hatred and what seems like countless hours to write up post after post of hateful, accusatory rhetoric. Ironically, I've been accused multiple times in the past by this moron for "not making sense", or for "not listening". Two traits which he is king at. Also, he *will* stalk you. In fact, he's the reason why every post I make on reddit these days is a throwaway account like this one.
just saying is all.... take that as you will... though the rabid disingenuous defense doesnt help your case
Houston isnt a problem, but you never mentioned if you were a girl?
I think their intentions are good. I think they're far better than most religious organizations. I don't agree with them. But reddit tends towards groupthink, and I'm presenting another side of it. And being downvoted accordingly.
This is excellent, but has anybody figured out a download URL for the FLVs?  Fucking Flash keeps crashing on me halfway through each segment.  EDIT: Heck with it, here we go... * [Part 1](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539437570_eb9c0fe379dc71717134607090b7cf78beea0342.flv?videoId=1438428757&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 2](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539464329_cb20949ab6961b40926818a0ee19b3d92bdbcded.flv?videoId=1442316088&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 3](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539437576_0999cbcb670c511fca3c1df1394677f35483a513.flv?videoId=1442316090&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 4](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539439543_0f8b99a234893034e6e577a217653775b2509fba.flv?videoId=1442316170&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 5](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539439545_fe008862d3d20eaf719be5ea595fc4e82a4bb8db.flv?videoId=1442316175&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 6](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539439546_531b074b2a8d15bad80c9390ab75594835589d8e.flv?videoId=1447922258&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 7](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539439547_717f01a41398f5922b92a7e29300b123e781d3c9.flv?videoId=1447240415&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 8](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539464333_b9f569ac69529629c6b781d660e32870d0163ab8.flv?videoId=1447922261&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 9](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539439549_6ea074e785dc9152d3c2c409d8cea544243e6ecc.flv?videoId=1447240421&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 10](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539439552_4f514fdbcd4b39d507b20565c78eb40c3547d354.flv?videoId=1447240425&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 11](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539464335_0c1e663db24e921845a4e9932f83ddaa6ccb2476.flv?videoId=1456276821&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 12](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539439555_eba40769fc24a5ba73415269ed0db45e1b025157.flv?videoId=1456276825&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 13](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539464336_e28d0839ee6ebe647ad421ff141da2fe571f6821.flv?videoId=1454975007&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)   * [Part 14](http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/d5/unsecured/media/598199/598199_1539437596_80abc4b99bd90bb035186a1b004b54b81d9e163c.flv?videoId=1456276829&amp;lineUpId=1442318652&amp;playerId=1315775922&amp;playerTag=&amp;affiliateId=)  (Depending on exactly how Brightcove's media distribution thingie functions, these may or may not continue to work.  And I'm assuming they aren't tied to my IP address.)
I can never trust you again, because you were wrong once. You should probably learn from this lesson, and never admit to being wrong again.
No:) I just first gather all of the data possible: IP addresses, cookies, login times, length of session, browser UA, site activity patterns... Then I feed it into a program I wrote that tries to determine which accounts belong to the same person. This data turns out to be very effective, most people screw up and cross-contaminate them eventually even if they are very careful. Then the program does the automatic statistical stuff to try to find any other correlations between accounts.  Basically, the idea is to combine all the accounts that belong to one person and make them count for only one. Captchas alone do little to solve the bigger problem....  This grouping algorithm could be easily used to further reduce spam also. I've been meaning to release this code..
Or a dead cat in a shoebox.
None of those apply to me and I still don't have a life.  Holy shit.
These folks dont understand how God works.  First... God WILL answer their prayers.  And lets say for a moment that he says "YES".  Tragically, all of a sudden, all these folks lose their jobs.  They can no longer pay their mortgages, and end up losing their homes.  Unable to find work, they end up moving closer to a new job, renting in a cheaper apartment.  Now instead of paying $3.80 a gallon, or $50 a week, they pay $3.80 a gallon, but only $30 a week because now they live closer, and pay less on rent.  God loves doing this kind of stuff to people.  Be careful what you ask for.. you might get it ;)  Oh sure.. on occassion, just to throw us off, God will toss someone a lucky Powerball lotto ticket. Thats just to confuse us.
stick it in the session and modify it as they navigate round your site?
Agreed. Outside of some of Wright's comments everything sounded quite tame compared to some of the all-white, evangelical congregations I have attended or been a part of in my life. Hell, even Wright didn't say anything crazier than I've heard from other over-excited sermons.
I object this exotification of India, because some moron will think this is how it is today.  oops, too late already spec209 has proved he is a moron. 
There's a photo of Prince in there.  And that proves that he is at least 125 years old, and will likely live to be 200.
Title should read: **Phoenix Mars Lander May Have Done What It Was Supposed To Do**
What's that woman sticking to the wall (about half-way down the list)?  They don't look like chapatis.
Clinton only has the popular vote if you use her math, which is very fuzzy.  She lost, she should concede instead of trying to force Obama into picking her as the Vice President.
..which means what, exactly? (I don't speak legalese).   That as content contributors, we can grant other entities the same rights... not just reddit?   (I'm not taking any position here, just trying to understand...) 
I think there's a video series called 'A Woman's Guide to Sex in the 21st Century' that has just that. They insert cameras inside and you got to see all the goings on.
Joe Lieberman most recently.  Read up on the Communications Decency Act, the Child Online Protection Act, the PROTECT Act, the Digital Millenium Copyright Act, the No Electronic Theft Act... those are the ones I know of off the top of my head.  Completely unconstitutional laws passed by legislators banning various forms of speech on the Internet.  All of them have been overturned by the Supreme Court so far... except maybe the PROTECT Act.  I've read differeing things about whether it is currently active or not.  According to Wikipedias page on the guy who got thrown in prison for "lolicon porn" (hand-drawn depictions of underage girls involved in sex), lolicon is still illegal to view or possess in the USA.  I thought that was overturned, but it's hard to keep track. As soon as the courts overturn one of the censorship laws, legislators pass another one.  One day, the Supreme Court will be too busy to hear a case challenging one of these laws.  On that day, the law will be stamped in concrete and will never be overturned (I believe.  Does anyone know of a situation in which the Supreme Court decided not to hear a case and later went back and heard a case trying to overturn the same law?).  I've got a novel idea that will never be implemented, at least not as part of any existing government, MAYBE it could be done if we were starting over... Any legislator, who has taken an oath to uphold and defend the Constitution, who passes a law that is later ruled to be unconstitutional, they should be recalled from office.  They spend MONTHS arguing over each bill, revising them, etc.  If they are so astoundingly corrupt or amazingly incompetent that after all of that they still cannot realize that a law is contrary to the Consitution, can anyone justify them remaining in office?  We're not talking about someone screwing up a calculation at work.  We're talking about a public servant violating what they have sworn to protect with a law that will be enforced by men with guns on over 300 million people.  This is not a trifling affair.
And disenfranchise the people that voted for him in Florida and to disallow the legions of loyal Michigan Obama supporters to have any voice at the national convention? No thanks. If I were a Michigan Obama supporter, I wouldn't be able to sleep at night if my entire delegation was for Clinton.
I never claimed that this is an elegant or "proper" solution, nor is it the way I would have written Digg myself.  But it is, in point of fact, precisely what Digg does.
Now you're thinking like a fundamentalist! Learning things is overrated.
I'm pretty sure most browsers do that. It saves a lot of time with those long lists, definitely, and that's why I like &lt;select&gt; for those. More people should know they can do that, but most people prefer using the mouse to fiddling with keystrokes. Too bad.
I compost dryer lint too. :)
gotcha.
Not to mention that many of the hijackers were Saudis. If the US gov't orchestrated the attacks, why didn't they invade Saudi Arabia? They certainly had the perfect pretext, and Saudi Arabia has a hell of a lot more oil than Iraq. (And it's light sweet crude to boot!)
Has the guy who wrote this ever actually touched a boob?
We call them "insurgents".
Bullshit 1) Toyota gives a warranty for 100,000 miles / 8 years on the battery. 2) The batteries last well for more than 100,000 miles.  EDIT: corrected warranty information
I didn't see that, but I thought of the [url=http://www.tecaeromex.com/ingles/RH-i.htm]Rocket Helicopter[/url].   What the heck, man!? html doesn't work, VBcode doesn't work, how is this done here?
Blacks are 3/5ths.  Mexicans and old people are 1/2.  (I don't mean it).
Only in Chicago. 
I wish I had done this when I put in my pond (It is a prefab pond but nonetheless the hole took a lot of work to dig)...we pulled the pond up this year and put in a tree. We have another pond in the back.  I wonder if this is on the list of stuff white people like. (koi ponds)  Should be.  
And now I'm being disingenuous?  You are intellectually bankrupt.
Bullshit should never be respected.
You do not have to be anti-Israel to have tired of all the wealth handed over to that country when so much needs to be done within the USA.
Fully clothed.
Why would someone "resign" from a church?  It's weird that churches turned to be more like institutions rather than places for worship.
Touche douche.
No, you should use the percentage of the 23.98 hours in a day that has past divided by pi, raised to e.  The fact that to a user mm/dd/yyyy and dd/mm/yyyy is literally the same is exactly the problem.
&gt; Sorry, but Obama's character judgement is not excusable.  Are you making that decision based on a single part of his personal life, or do you have other objections to Obama's "character judgment" skills? McCain seems to think Bush is a swell guy, and Hillary is *married* to Bill who clearly is no angel. What standard are you using to compare character judgment ability between candidates?  I agree that Wright's comments were inappropriate and politically embarrassing. I flat disagree that Wright, as a *religious and spiritual* advisor to Mr. Obama, should at any point enter into the political discussion. Are we honestly at a point in our political discourse that we can no longer discuss what the *candidate* says and not which candidate has the least number of skeletons in their past?
I think you were modded down for not RTFA. Standard rediquette.
And I let these fuckers fingerprint me. Twice.   They brought up all my info and said to me 'have you recently visted the US'? 'Where did you go, what did you do? What are you here for now?' I was at LAX on a stopover on my way to London. 'Oh you're a scientist? What kind of scientist? Do you have any samples?'   I told them I'm a biologist but I work with computers. 'Wheres your laptop then?' I explain I'm going on holiday after my conference and I'll have computer access at the university I'm visiting in the UK, so my old, heavy laptop was too much of a burden to bring.   'So what are you doing in the US?' Dammit I already told you people. I'm only here because I'm going to London from New Zealand, its a fucking long flight, it needs to refuel, and you assholes are forcing me to come through your customs.  Computational biologist without a laptop? Am I suspicious now? Because I have a good workstation at work and I'm too poor to upgrade my laptop?  Now my government (NZ) is apparently co-operating with this shit. If there is any western nation that is NOT part of the "war on terror" its NZ. And now this.
Castle of the Winds. I fire it up at work every now and then. Its a great little dungeon crawler.
Love the picture. Either the photographer was shorter than the author or the man walks around with his shoulders clenched up around his ears :)
Pretty smart really.  Even if you kill them they can still hang around for 10 minutes and mess everything up.
I'm not American so I don't get this part.  If he wasn't on the ballot, how did MI vote for him exactly? Can you write in a name? How does that work?
I wish to unsubscribe from your phonetics.
I'm not very impressed with this article at all.  It tries to justify social narcissism by saying "sometimes useless trivia winds up saving the day!"  Sure, there are occasions when a story in the news provokes a deep discussion on social issues but the article fails to explain why sitting around having a chat about what Britney's child care practices mean for the world at large actually does to change anything.  Although I'm the first to point out the faults of "serious" journalism, such as their obsession with scandal and sensation the goal of the news is to provide information about the world.  The goal of "entertainment journalism," or whatever you call tabloid writing, is to entertain the world by providing more details on entertainers.  The focus of the medium is entirely dedicated to scandal and celebrity and this brings in a huge number of viewers.  This shouldn't be news, people generally like being entertained more than they like learning, and reading about the world or watching the evening news is much more geared to distributing facts.  Now I'm speaking in ideal generalities, everyone can rattle off examples of how the corporate news media focuses on sensation and non-issues, but the basic crux of their difference remains.  Entertainment media aims to entertain, and news media aims to provide information.  Neither branch of the media exists to provide a guide to having fun conversations with your friend.  The fact it's easier to use Bennifer as a segue to a conversation about real issues with this particular authors group of friends doesn't mean anything at all past, groups of friends often like entertaining conversation.  Does having a conversation with friends actually do anything to change the world, does it raise awareness of totally new issues, does it create a wave of enlightenment that sweeps the globe?  No.  It does none of those things.  It passes the time pleasantly.  Watching E! then watching CNN and judging which one gives you better conversations with friends is the definition of being socially vapid; it is certainly not a metric to evaluate the social worth of the information.
Thanks for the correction. I don't think that it's any question that you could draw up a phylogenetic map of any current religion, but yet almost all of them want to claim that they are the one true way with absolutely nothing to back that up but their assertions and unique interpretations of something that should be clearly spelled out if it were based on an intimate knowledge of god.
can a circle not be infinite?
You're all fucking lunatics, mind you that's just speculation.
I appreciate the information. I know shamefully little about HTML. What I do know is that I feel sorry for programmers and the multiple platform hell they live in.
I actually think the caucuses are better anyway.  They show which candidate has stronger support - in a primary, you get a lot out of name recognition, and that is not something we want. If people will go publicly support their candidate and spend a couple of hours doing so, they are showing that they're willing to spend their time (and money) during the general election.  Landslide losses in caucuses spell doom for campaigns.
I feel the need to correct you.  I have always known that I would never have an abortion, no matter what the circumstance. You said:  &gt;People who don't want to have a baby are going to accomplish that goal  Which, yes, did and still does apply to me. When I have not wanted to become pregnant, I have made certain that I did not become pregnant.  The time to determine if you are the type of person that can kill your own child is not when the pregnancy test shows positive, but well before. Someone failed this girl, I'd venture to say her parents. At 13 she should have been at very least educated as to the mechanics of the human body and should not have been placed in the situation of being alone with a young man long enough to become pregnant.
Stop the stupidity.
You kicked him too hard?
May I please be on the Jury?
Sick makes me spelling bees.
I'm watching the part where he's watching the propaganda video in the Pueblo. And it struck me: its the same voice as those Youtube videos that I thought were fakes. Oh my.
Ron Paul is insignificant --- Like anybody thinks he is.
Constitutional hard-liners might take issue with his desire to bring back the federal assault weapons ban (or create a concealed weapons ban, etc.), either on 2nd amendment grounds that it is a protected right to own them, or based on the 10th amendment and the lack of federal authority to ban weapons in the constitution.  http://www.cnn.com/ELECTION/2008/issues/issues.gun.html http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tenth_Amendment_to_the_United_States_Constitution  Not that I necessarily agree, just explaining why some people might feel that way.
I'm legally blind, and my entire life I've gotten afterimages whenever I close my eyes or in a very dark room. They never, ever go away, and they sometimes interfere with my vision. They are pink and green swirls, sort of what you see when you close your eyes and push on them with your fingers.  Most of the time, the images are swirls and odd patterns. But sometimes they seem to resolve into images, such as a person's face, or people walking.  The article says: "He began to see half-formed letters and lines, zigs and zags, "a play of flickering shapes." They are hallucinations, and as it turns out, not all that uncommon among people with serious visual impairments." so I guess what I see is normal for someone with my disability.  I still learn things about being visually impaired, even though I was born this way.
Congrats Manram.  Maybe this wakes up the rest of the bats.
I was watching the hearings.  During the part where that Florida Senator was talking, he was complaining that their primary was moved up because the Republican state government forced them to.  I wonder why they didn't explain this to the DNC to begin with.  They had time and ample opportunity.  This is merely an attempt of Clinton to steal an election.  She's sending a message to the superdelegates all right, a message that says: "I am ready, willing, and able to use the same tactics George Bush used to steal the election in 2000 to secure my election in 2008."
Well...  Jesus was a zombie, so his flesh must be gray...
&gt; This is the guy who said "I don't really understand economics".  Yeah and Paul is the doctor who doesn't understand science, so I guess they're both in the same boat. Also Paul doesn't understand what's in the constitution either, as he thinks it's full of references to god. 
Yup, they are all really clippings. They just all weren't printed in good faith.
It means that they don't reserve the exclusive right.  If I republish what I'm writing now reddit can't go after me because they don't reserve the exclusive right. Basically I own what is being written right now, but I have given reddit rights to what I'm writing.  
He wants to go to a "smaller" college.
http://www.mythtv.org/
what are you.. high?  oh wait. Carry on.
Not alt text.  Alternative text implies there is primary text. And primary text is nonexistent. 
More like lick his asshole clean.  Toilet paper is for scrubs.
How would the absence of patents improve pharmaceutical development?  There would be literally *no* incentive driving drug discovery.  Honestly I can't think of any way to do without patents. My personal belief is that the best possible system is to mandate licensing, where if you use a patented technology you owe that patent's owner 10% of your revenue (or some other fixed number). Have the patent expire 20 or so years after a working implementation first hits the market. Finally, eliminate all the bullshit patents that are being handed out today—err on the side of too few patents rather than too many.
How can I watch this 42 years ago? I wasn't even born until 1981!
Have been sitting here for 5 minutes trying to find the words re this repulsive woman.  She is, in a nutshell, everything that is wrong with their love affair with Clinton.  Makes me ashamed to be female.   On second thought - Clinton should have had this woman by her side 'protecting' her against the 'snipers' in Bosnia.
I just watched the movie Saved. Christians make for some good comedy!
Weird, the screen says No and then off to the side barely visible in the darkness is ...But...
Hmmm... thank you.  I thought he was drinking a beer and she was smoking a joint. Must put my glasses on...
I own it, and reddit can use it that is all.
You're a towel.
Unless the US federal election used just about *anything* else aside from the retarded first-past-the-post voting system.
Your gay (Walker, 2006).
I really, really wish I could understand her supporters - I see some on tv, mostly women, and they seem like normal, reasonable people.  But after seeing some of her blatantly contradictory statements (I'm trying to be charitable and not say *lies*) I just wonder, did they *MISS* those things?  Were they absent that day?  Because at the beginning of the primary season, I had a positive perception of her... then she opened her mouth!  She is a total good ol' boy!
Sweet shit. I'd tap that.
Indeed. That was one of the best bathroom stories I've ever heard.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Oxyhydrogen
Yeah, especially tonight.
The girl is 13. When I was in public school we were not taught about birth control until 10th grade, average age 15.  The role of educating children about what their bodies are capable of needs to be the parents first.   I've known kids that were having sex at 12 that didn't know that's what they were doing, had no idea that's what the taboo sex thing was and they had already done it. Years before the public school sex ed class.
yeah, can someone fill us in on the wedding couple aliens (or whatever they are)? 
He's not an Urban Legend. He actually exists.
The DNC has to attempt to appease Clinton supporters while still allowing Obama to keep his rightful lead.  This was their way to do that.
The importance of marijuana has been exaggerated by its illicit status, just as the importance of alcohol is exaggerated among teenagers by its illicit status.  The actual physical and psychological *effects* of marijuana are vastly outpaced in the popular discourse by the social baggage it carries. And as with every psychoactive drug, its effects are profoundly influenced by the expectations that users bring with them.  There is no particular reason that alcohol should be correlated with social conformity and marijuana with rebellion. During Prohibition in the U.S., alcohol was trendy in part because it was anti-authoritarian. Marijuana has been at times used as a tool of conformity, as with the ancient Hashishin.  Yes, marijuana should be legalized. The damage done by prohibition is huge. But this should not mean that everyone should smoke up all the time, any more than the legalization of alcohol means that everyone should be drunk all the time.
Especially when the teacher is a prick about being wrong.
Sorry Hillary, I voted for you for you Senate seat and will never vote for you again.
Trash is considered abandoned so it's not subject to the Fourth Amendment.  There's no reason it wouldn't be admissible.  I think you might be thinking about how probative it is.  Since it's public, how can they establish it was yours.
Jesus that is unnerving. I can barely understand it that English is so bad. Her grammar is painful.
not best but most efficient.
This submission delivers.
Parties that have a nomination battle all the way to the convention tend to not do well in November.
I'm saying that *by their definition*, they're not a religion. By yours, they may be. But the difference is one of opinion - religionisalie.com is making a semantic argument, but *not* one that is dishonest - it's just based on a different definition of religion.
I am. I'd manage to come to terms with the drama, and pray for no retraction.  They say there are no atheists in foxholes ... I'd probably be OK facing death, but I'd have to pray that there was no retraction. Just to cover the bases.
You know, these people represent us, and I won't lie, Clinton does not represent me in the least bit.
it depends on the local or state laws.  where i live (vermont) - private road means private whether its gated or not.
Parkinsons disease is a bitch.
About time. Long overdue.
I'm an Obama supporter who has yet to meet an intelligent Clinton supporter.
I probably should not have been so forward as to assume to speak for anyone else.  I have no idea what everyone thinks about Hillary.  I was actually an early supporter of Hillary.  I do think that she is smart and very capable.  But I have been just appalled at the way she has run her campaign. The lies and spinning and the sleaziness of Bill all just came back with such force.  Mostly it is the stand-up in-your-face brazen lies.  The Clintons do that like no one else that I have ever seen.  But please don't hate us.  We love you anyway.
too bad the US has a sizable group of religious nutjobs that fail to understand this
Apparently not in this case, sir.
Not funny.
My species has invented something that might help.  We call it "fire".
You're right, that's what I meant to say.
looks like torture to me.
&gt;In so much that even a complete lie can pass the credibility test. And pass a poly while in fact being not forthcoming.  Hank didn't smoke marijuana. Hank is asked if he smoked marijuana (while on probation). Hank answers "No." Hank is telling the truth. Hank is identified as telling the truth.  ***BUT*** Hank isn't "Hank"'s real name. "Hank" was never on probation. "Hank" is an actor.  Meta-*But* "Hank" didn't smoke pot, either. "Hank" really was answering the questions truthfully. "Hank" was correctly and accurately identified as honest, insofar as the questions he was actually asked during the polygraph are concerned.  &gt;He didn't cheat the machine, he cheated the person operating the machine.  I'm not seeing that he cheated the machine or the person operating the machine.   Unless being identified as telling the truth while you're telling the truth is a cheat.   He was significantly dishonest with the producers of the show about his backstory, apparently, but I didn't see him get polygraphed about that.  Just a few key points in the larger context of the lie he told to the producers were clarified with the polygraph... and those points were answered truthfully (both for the actor and the character the actor was playing, apparently).
Im amazed by the apparent fact that:  A - Most people here are atheists and believe Christians are idiot fools  B - That these atheists mentioned above would support a candidate that is an apparent idiot fool (See A)  Shouldnt you folks be calling him ignorant names for believing in a sky pixie? I mean, which version of "Christian" is he anyway? The kind that damns homosexuals to hell?  Or the kind that believes in a book that says a man was swallowed by a whale and lived?  That Mary had a baby without ever having intercourse? Or the kind that wants to put the ten commandments in every public building?  Stone a woman for causing her husband to be an adulterer?  Believe that the world is only 6000 years old?  Dinosaurs rode on the ark with Noah?  Isnt, by conventional Reddit wisdom, Obama a complete loon which ought to be put in a straight jacket?  We are, after all, selecting a man who represents us.  Shouldnt he be an INTELLIGENT person?
The only rational i can think of is that these men are very insecure of either their equipment or skills in bed, and figure a virgin wont know the difference....   sure, there is the raw excitement of being a girls first...but after the initial 'Big Bang' if ya will, you just have an unexperienced partner, who is probably afraid of sexual experimentation as witnessed by her virginal state at marriage, as well as a very foolish and ignorant person you have to put up with by law.. i suppose if your a dominant asshole who wants to rule over a stupid virgin off the farm thats great.    I wish somebody had statistics on how many virgin brides voluntarily took it up the pooper on their wedding night.. but hell, that would be extra dangerous after amateur toothy head..
Yeah the progressive candidate should choose the ignorant confederate who is still living in the 1800's. That would be a brilliant choice for him. It would be great if Obama choose a running mate who opposes the civil rights act, the very piece of legislation that gave him the opportunity have a better life than previous generations of African-Americans.   Maybe he should choose David Duke instead or whoever the current grand dragon of the KKK is as his running mate.   
I think the issue is really the prioritisation of these stories to the headlines of the MSM. 'And our main story tonight: Is Britney a junkie?'
Fyi, if they are searching trash, they don't need a warrant.  If you throw something out, it's considered abandoned.
A graphical user interface interface.  In real time, too.
doesn't look like he's at a rave
Maybe there is a pedagogical reason in not picking a dilemma that is entirely clear cut. It requires the student to do more work to apply different moral frameworks.  I don't know the precise details of your assignment but despite the fact that you wrote "drivel," did it require you to understand Kant and Rawls' theories very well in order to apply them to a situation that is sort of but not clearly a moral question?  Just proposing a possible explanation here.
Don't be harsh to Hillary - she's the best Republican running!
After watching this... I don't think i want to ever own a cat.
I'm seeing this more and more - People ditching life-long democratic party allegiance rather than vote for a black man.   As appalled as I am, the republicans can have these idiots.
Mac Mini, Handbrake, VLC, DVi -&gt; HDMI Cable, toslink optical cable -&gt; Sound system.
Their intentions are bait-and-switch. They're trying to hoodwink the anti-authoritarian demographic into becoming Christians by pretending not to be a Christian sect. Just like Jews for Jesus, which is this other sect trying to hoodwink Jews into becoming Christians by pretendending not to be a Christian sect.
Fort Detrick Scientists &lt;Themselves&gt; Think the Killer Anthrax Came from their Facility.
And Obama won because he's black. Because you know how those blacks get all the breaks.  I hope Geraldine Ferraro gets hit by a bus.
It was a clever headline.  I hope I'm not the only one to appreciate it.
I disagree - you're supporting a weak argument, and then blaming the weakness on reddit 'groupthink'. 
You think they care about rules? They already said "fuck you" to the DNC by holding their primaries early with only one of the two candidates on the ballot. They want Hillary to win at all costs or destroy the DNC in the process.
Yes, but companies just patent part of a process, then 15 years later patent another part...
If that willie feeling in your stomach is addictive I recommend this site.  http://www.popthatzit.com/
Thank you kind sir.  I was waiting for that Robocop joke.
I guess our only hope is that apathy &gt; racism.
You should check the [28 Days Later Website](http://28dayslater.co.uk) for hundreds of reports on abandoned places, including hospitals.
That's the exact building I was talking about.
-Voltaire?
Never heard about that. Doesn't make much sense.  But maybe you are interested to hear that the brake pads last a lot longer than in conventional cars because they are rarely used because of the regenerative breaking.
Way to go, George!
One is a matter of whether they need a warrant to search the trash, i.e. does the Fourth Amendment protect your trash? That's a question of law. The other is a question of whether the evidence is actually yours, and wasn't placed there by another.  That's a question of fact. It doesn't go to the issue of whether they can search it, only to the issue of whether it's yours.
Unless its something socially relevant, like Paris Hilton getting off easy from those drunk driving charges, or Tom Cruise's role within CoS, the vast majority of this shit is most certainly not politics.
i am SO buying a used car!  that's just crazy!!!
An oldie but a goodie... I remember that from the first time I found c&amp;h a few years ago, happily browsing through every c&amp;h comic they had. Even my anti-internet sister liked them.
And that comes from a nazi.
Or learn by doing! Just don't get hung-up on it, and don't get caught.
They took our jerbs!!!
For one who believes he's got the supernatural ability to rise from the dead and later ascend bodily, it's not much of a stretch to believe his body was then removed from this universe (and is now in heaven? which is also not in this universe?).  Downmodded for not being clever.
Here's the physics.  Would you expect to be able to rake the ash out of your fireplace, press it into the shape of a log, light it and burn it all over again?  Of course not.  In the same way, water is hydrogen ash.  It's been burnt ALREADY.  You cannot burn it again.
The first place to search is /b/
Well, the prize's first name is Google; it's a joint operation with the X-Prize Foundation. It seems to me that Google doesn't even really realize anything bad is going on, since they're not concentrating enough on the prize and are just letting the X-Prize Foundation do everything without objection from them.
This has come up a couple times before: http://www.reddit.com/info/6lcyv/comments/ http://www.reddit.com/info/6lcp7/comments/
My wife was a virgin when we got together. Wasn't a big deal. I didn't have to worry about HIV or any other STD's. I didn't find out she was a virgin for a few dates. As soon as she said she was, I was so excited. We didn't have to wait for an HIV test before we got busy. I know that HIV is very low in the lesbian circle but one can never be sure since many lesbians have had sex with men before. (Neither of us had)
Yeah, just like 90% of scripting languages. So what?
They'll come up with even more complex "Hillarithmetic" to "prove" she's the winner.
not this shit again.
Well, fucking suspend it then.
HTML isn't programming. It's markup.
The truly rich do not work for money, their money works for them and many skim from the wealth of the masses.
The long, unnecessary captchas are the biggest annoyance by far, I believe. Just look at RapidShare's shit. Type all the letters with cats in them? What the hell is that? And then make me wait the two minutes again if I see a dog that looks like a goddamn cat. Seriously...
How the fuck can they do this when Obama wasn't even on the ballot?  Either they redo the primaries in Michigan and Florida with everybody on board or they don't allow any of the results to count.  
If his loyalties really were with the country he would have left the party that has demolished the country and the constitution over the past 8 years. But instead he decided he wanted to lead that party and get their nomination and even after the way they've treated him, he still wants to be a part of their gang. Yeah that certainly is loyalty to the country :/
Scope creep...
I haven't seen 711was_a_retail_job in a while
[Citation Needed]
You may as well argue about the cultural significance of King Arthur or Robin Hood. It's no different, it's just belief in a fictional hero that made it onto a world scale, not just a national one. Cultural impact of stories is very different to the cultural impact of actual events and actual people.
I see this kind of reaction (yours, that is) a lot, and not just to Jeff's blog.  Your reaction and general inability to reason like a human being are common among zealots who've been crossed.  Jeff evidently dissed your favorite language, or OS, or editor, or said something that you insecurely took to mean your girlfriend is uglier than you are.  And now you're in "ran out of interesting things to say" mode.  We need to come up with a name for this kind of reaction.  It's a Disgruntled Commenter Pattern, but it has specific characteristics.  The Jilted Lover, maybe?
definately a perv in a punisher shirt
Iron Man's original suit as well. I guess the same company did the effects.
It's good to see that women will always keep fighting for "their rights" even in the face of common sense and democracy. You go girls! :)  /sarcasm
By an objective definition, they are a Christian sect, as they derive their core belief from Christianity -- necessarily, as there's pretty much no contemporary source other than the Bible that corroborates Jesus' existence. Recent scholarly research has underscored this point -- that without the Bible, there's no evidence that Jesus ever existed. Subjective definitions don't come into it. Yes, they are dishonest, and yes, so are you.
Psycho?  She seems like a perfectly normal Clinton supporter to me!
They still don't brush up against these patents. These are patents on the manufacture of large cells.
How many times do we have to discover ice on Mars before we stop being surprised by it?
I choose to exemplify Diogenes. I just farted... Enjoy.
